Indiana, session 2026, SB250.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 7.1-1-3-46.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 46.5. "THC" means
tetrahydrocannabinol, including hemp derived cannabinoid
products, synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the
plant or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, and synthetic
substances, derivates, and their isomers with a similar chemical
structure and pharmacological activity.
SECTION 2. IC 7.1-5-7-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.159-2014,
SECTION 49, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Subject to IC 7.1-5-1-6.5, it is a Class C
misdemeanor for a minor to knowingly:
(1) possess an alcoholic beverage or a product containing THC;
(2) consume an alcoholic beverage or a product containing
THC; or
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(3) transport an alcoholic beverage or a product containing
THC on a public highway when not accompanied by at least one
(1) of the minor's parents or guardians.
(b) If a minor is found to have violated subsection (a)(2) or (a)(3)
while operating a vehicle, the court may order the minor's driving
privileges suspended for up to one (1) year. However, if the minor is
less than eighteen (18) years of age, the court shall order the minor's
driving privileges suspended for at least sixty (60) days.
(c) The court shall deliver any order suspending a minor's driving
privileges under this section to the bureau of motor vehicles, which
shall suspend the minor's driving privileges under IC 9-24-18-12.2 for
the period ordered by the court.
SECTION 3. IC 7.1-5-7-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2019,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) It is a Class B misdemeanor for a person to
recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally sell, barter, exchange, provide,
or furnish an alcoholic beverage or a product containing THC to a
minor.
(b) However, the offense described in subsection (a) is:
(1) a Class A misdemeanor if the person has a prior unrelated
conviction under this section; and
(2) a Level 6 felony if the consumption, ingestion, or use of the
alcoholic beverage or product containing THC is the proximate
cause of the serious bodily injury or death of any person.
(c) A person who knowingly or intentionally:
(1) rents property; or
(2) provides or arranges for the use of property;
for the purpose of allowing or enabling a minor to consume an
alcoholic beverage or a product containing THC on the property
commits a Class C infraction. However, the violation is a Class B
misdemeanor if the person has a prior unrelated adjudication or
conviction for a violation of this section within the previous five (5)
years.
(d) This section shall not be construed to impose civil liability upon
any postsecondary educational institution, including public and private
universities and colleges, business schools, vocational schools, and
schools for continuing education, or its agents for injury to any person
or property sustained in consequence of a violation of this section
unless the institution or its agent:
(1) sells, barters, exchanges, provides, or furnishes an alcoholic
beverage or a product containing THC to a minor; or
(2) either:
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(A) rents property; or
(B) provides or arranges for the use of property;
for the purpose of allowing or enabling a minor to consume an
alcoholic beverage or a product containing THC on the
property.
SECTION 4. IC 7.1-5-7-15 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. A person
twenty-one (21) years of age or older who knowingly or intentionally
encourages, aids, or induces a minor to unlawfully possess an alcoholic
beverage or a product containing THC commits a Class C infraction.
SECTION 5. IC 7.1-5-7-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.216-2011,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. The commission shall conduct random
unannounced inspections at locations where alcoholic beverages or
products containing THC are sold or distributed to ensure compliance
with this title. Only the commission may conduct the random
unannounced inspections. The commission may use retired or off duty
law enforcement officers to conduct inspections under this section.
SECTION 6. IC 7.1-5-7-18 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) A law enforcement officer vested with full
police powers and duties may engage an individual who is:
(1) at least sixteen (16) years of age; and
(2) less than twenty-one (21) years of age;
to receive or purchase a product that contains any amount of THC
as part of an enforcement action under this article.
(b) The initial or contemporaneous receipt or purchase of a
product that contains any amount of THC must:
(1) occur under the direction of a law enforcement officer
vested with full police powers and duties; and
(2) be a part of the enforcement action.
SECTION 7. IC 7.1-5-10-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.159-2014,
SECTION 80, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) A person who, knowing that another
person is intoxicated, sells, barters, delivers, or gives away an alcoholic
beverage or a product containing THC to the intoxicated person
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) In any civil proceeding in which damages are sought from a
permittee or a permittee's agent for the refusal to serve a person an
alcoholic beverage or a product containing THC, it is a complete
defense if the permittee or agent reasonably believed that the person
was intoxicated or was otherwise not entitled to be served an alcoholic
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


beverage or a product containing THC.
(c) After charges have been filed against a person for a violation of
subsection (a), the prosecuting attorney shall notify the commission of
the charges filed.
SECTION 8. IC 7.1-5-10-15.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.5. (a) As used in this
section, "furnish" includes barter, deliver, sell, exchange, provide, or
give away.
(b) A person who furnishes an alcoholic beverage or a product
containing THC to a person is not liable in a civil action for damages
caused by the impairment or intoxication of the person who was
furnished the alcoholic beverage or product containing THC unless:
(1) the person furnishing the alcoholic beverage or product
containing THC had actual knowledge that the person to whom
the alcoholic beverage or product containing THC was
furnished was visibly intoxicated at the time the alcoholic
beverage or product containing THC was furnished; and
(2) the intoxication of the person to whom the alcoholic beverage
or product containing THC was furnished was a proximate
cause of the death, injury, or damage alleged in the complaint.
(c) If a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age suffers
injury or death proximately caused by the person's voluntary
intoxication, the:
(1) person;
(2) person's dependents;
(3) person's personal representative; or
(4) person's heirs;
may not assert a claim for damages for personal injury or death against
a person who furnished an alcoholic beverage or a product containing
THC that contributed to the person's intoxication, unless subsections
(b)(1) and (b)(2) apply.
SECTION 9. IC 7.1-7-3-4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4. An e-liquid that is a hemp derived cannabinoid
product is subject to this article and IC 7.1-8.
SECTION 10. IC 7.1-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW ARTICLE TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]:
ARTICLE 8. HEMP DERIVED CANNABINOID PRODUCTS
Chapter 1. Applicability, Purpose, and Effective Date
Sec. 1. This article is effective October 1, 2026.
Sec. 2. (a) This article does not limit the powers or duties of the
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


commission under IC 7.1-2.
(b) This article may not be construed to restrict or limit any law
under IC 35-48.
Sec. 3. The purpose of this article is to promote the health and
safety of hemp derived cannabinoid products by:
(1) ensuring hemp derived cannabinoid products sold in
Indiana meet federal laws and regulations;
(2) creating a permitting scheme for hemp derived
cannabinoid products in Indiana so that hemp derived
cannabinoid products may be sold and have law enforcement
oversight; and
(3) requiring persons distributing hemp derived cannabinoid
products in Indiana to have valid permits and to submit an
applicable certificate of analysis to the commission.
Sec. 4. The definitions in IC 35-48-8 apply throughout this
chapter.
Sec. 5. A product that purports to be a hemp derived
cannabinoid product, but is in violation of this article, is to be
treated as marijuana (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29).
Chapter 2. Definitions
Sec. 1. The definitions in this chapter apply throughout this
article.
Sec. 2. "Batch" means a specific quantity of a specific product
containing cannabinoids derived from hemp that is:
(1) manufactured at the same time;
(2) manufactured using the same:
(A) methods;
(B) equipment; and
(C) ingredients;
that are uniform and intended to meet specifications for
identity, strength, purity, and composition; and
(3) manufactured, packaged, and labeled according to a single
batch production record that is:
(A) executed; and
(B) documented.
Sec. 3. "CBD product" means a product that contains a
cannabidiol or cannabigerol but does not contain
tetrahydrocannabinol, any other cannabinoids, or any other
controlled substances.
Sec. 3.5. "Container" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-8-2.
Sec. 4. (a) "Hemp derived cannabinoid product" has the
meaning set forth in IC 35-48-8-4.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


Sec. 5. "Hemp distributor" means a person who distributes
hemp derived cannabinoid products and has a permit under
IC 7.1-8-10.
Sec. 6. "Hemp manufacturer" means a person who produces
hemp derived cannabinoid products and has a permit under
IC 7.1-8-9.
Sec. 7. "Hemp retailer" means a person who sells or dispenses
a hemp derived cannabinoid product and has a permit under
IC 7.1-8-11.
Sec. 8. "Law enforcement officer" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-31.5-2-185.
Sec. 9. "Marijuana" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-48-1.1-29.
Sec. 10. "Permit holder" means a person who holds a valid
permit issued under this article.
Chapter 3. Commission Duties
Sec. 1. The commission shall enforce and administer this article.
Sec. 2. The commission shall:
(1) issue permits under this article;
(2) assess fees to permit holders;
(3) approve or deny permit applications;
(4) create an online data base for permit information,
certificate of analysis information, and other information
related to hemp derived cannabinoid products in Indiana;
(5) monitor all permit holders;
(6) monitor all hemp derived cannabinoid products
manufactured, distributed, and retailed in Indiana;
(7) test all hemp derived cannabinoid products as necessary
to ensure compliance with this article;
(8) train excise officers to implement and enforce this article;
and
(9) create an affidavit for purposes of IC 7.1-8-6-1(a).
Sec. 3. The commission may audit the records of a permit holder
at any time to ensure compliance with:
(1) this article;
(2) rules adopted by the commission;
(3) permit requirements; and
(4) permit conditions.
Sec. 4. (a) The commission may inspect a permit holder's:
(1) records;
(2) property, including vehicles;
(3) hemp; and
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(4) hemp derived cannabinoid products.
(b) The commission may conduct an inspection under this
section independently or in cooperation with:
(1) the state police department;
(2) a federal law enforcement agency; or
(3) a local law enforcement agency.
Chapter 4. Prescription Drugs
Sec. 1. This article does not apply to the sale or possession of the
following:
(1) Marinol.
(2) Syndros.
(3) Cesamet.
(4) Epidiolex.
Sec. 2. An individual who is less than twenty-one (21) years of
age may purchase and possess a CBD product.
Chapter 5. Permit Applications
Sec. 1. The commission may:
(1) consider;
(2) approve;
(3) deny; or
(4) renew;
an application to manufacture, distribute, or sell a hemp derived
cannabinoid product.
Sec. 2. If an applicant intentionally misstates a material fact in
an application for a permit under this chapter, the commission
shall deny the application.
Sec. 3. (a) An application for a permit under this article must
include the following:
(1) The name of the applicant.
(2) The address of the premises to which the permit will be
applicable.
(3) A nonrefundable fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(4) The name under which the applicant transacts or intends
to transact business.
(5) The address of the applicant.
(6) An express statement of the applicant that the applicant
consents for the duration of the permit term and one (1) year
after the permit expires, to the entrance, inspection, and
search and seizure by an enforcement officer, without a
warrant, of the licensed premises and vehicles to determine
whether the applicant is complying with this article. The
applicant's consent required by this section is renewed and
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


continued by the retention of a permit or its use by the
applicant.
(7) A signed statement by the applicant, under the penalties of
perjury, that the individual applying for the permit has not
been convicted, in the previous five (5) years, of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1)
year;
(B) a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony
under Indiana law;
(C) a drug related Level 6 felony or misdemeanor;
(D) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty
equal to the penalty for a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4,
or Level 5 felony; or
(E) a drug related felony or misdemeanor in a state other
than Indiana.
(8) A written consent for the state police department to
conduct a state or national criminal history background check
of the applicant.
(b) The commission shall deposit an application fee received
under subsection (a)(3) in the hemp derived cannabinoid products
fund established by IC 7.1-8-16.
Sec. 4. (a) Upon receipt of a permit application under this
chapter, the commission shall forward a copy of the application to
the state police department.
(b) The state police department shall do the following:
(1) Perform a state or national criminal history background
check of the applicant.
(2) Determine if the applicant was convicted, in the previous
five (5) years, of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1)
year;
(B) a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony
under Indiana law;
(C) a drug related Level 6 felony or misdemeanor;
(D) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty
equal to the penalty for a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4,
or Level 5 felony; or
(E) a drug related felony or misdemeanor in a state other
than Indiana.
(3) Return the application to the commission with the state
police department's determinations and a copy of the state or
national criminal history background check.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(c) The commission may assess a fee of one hundred dollars
($100) on behalf of the state police department to conduct criminal
background checks.
(d) The commission shall review a permit application and
criminal background check information returned from the state
police department.
(e) If the commission determines that all the requirements under
this chapter have been met and that a permit should be granted to
the applicant, the commission shall approve the application for
issuance of a permit.
Sec. 5. (a) The commission may not issue a permit under this
chapter to an individual who:
(1) is less than twenty-one (21) years of age;
(2) is not registered with the secretary of state to do business
in Indiana;
(3) has or had an interest in a hemp permit, an alcohol permit,
or a tobacco sales certificate that has been revoked by the
commission in the previous five (5) years;
(4) does not have lawful status (as defined in IC 9-13-2-92.3);
(5) has been convicted within five (5) years, and the conviction
has not been expunged under IC 35-38-9, before the date of
application of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1)
year;
(B) a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4, or Level 5 felony
under Indiana law;
(C) a drug related Level 6 felony or misdemeanor;
(D) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty
equal to the penalty for a Level 1, Level 2, Level 3, Level 4,
or Level 5 felony; or
(E) a drug related felony or misdemeanor in a state other
than Indiana;
(6) is non compos mentis; or
(7) has made an application for a permit under this title that
has been denied less than one (1) year prior to the person's
application for a hemp permit unless the first application was
denied by reason of a procedural or technical defect.
(b) Subsection (a)(1) does not prevent a minor from being a
stockholder in a corporation.
Sec. 6. (a) A permit issued by the commission under this article
must contain the following information:
(1) The permit number.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(2) The permit holder's name.
(3) The name and address of the business for which the permit
is issued.
(4) The expiration date of the permit.
(b) A permit issued under this article is:
(1) valid for one (1) year after the date of issuance, unless the
commission suspends or revokes the permit; and
(2) nontransferable.
Sec. 7. The commission may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
establish procedures for the issuance, renewal, reinstatement, and
maintenance of a permit under this article.
Chapter 6. Permits
Sec. 1. (a) If a permit holder sells a hemp business and permit
issued under this article, the new owner:
(1) must also file a new application for that type of hemp
permit that the previous owner held;
(2) is subject to all of the rules and regulations that applied to
the previous permit holder; and
(3) must provide the commission with proof of the sale,
including:
(A) a purchase agreement; or
(B) an affidavit signed by the applicant on the form
described in IC 7.1-8-3-2(9).
(b) The previous permit holder's permit is void after the later of
the following:
(1) The date of the sale of the business.
(2) The date of the transfer of the business.
(c) The commission may choose to not issue a permit to the new
owner if the new owner does not comply with the application
requirements of this article.
Sec. 2. (a) A separate permit is required for each location in
which a hemp derived cannabinoid product is manufactured,
distributed, or sold.
(b) A person may have multiple permits for manufacturing,
distributing, or retail selling of hemp, but a person may not have
both:
(1) manufacturing and distribution permits;
(2) manufacturing and retail permits; or
(3) distribution and retail permits.
Sec. 3. A person who has been approved to be a hemp permit
holder must conspicuously display the holder's hemp permit on the
holder's premises, and keep the permit posted and displayed, as
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


soon as the commission has approved the permit and as long as the
permit is valid.
Sec. 4. The commission shall not issue more than one (1) type of
permit under this article to a person.
Chapter 7. Deposit of Permits
Sec. 1. (a) If a permit holder is unable to immediately operate
the business for which the permit was issued, the permit holder
shall deposit the permit with the commission, subject to the
commission's approval. The commission may approve the deposit
of the permit for the following terms:
(1) An initial term of deposit that expires twenty-four (24)
months after the date of the commission's approval.
(2) An extension of the term of deposit that expires twelve (12)
months after the date the initial term of deposit under
subdivision (1) expires.
(3) An extension of the term of deposit that expires twelve (12)
months after the date the initial term of deposit under
subdivision (2) expires.
(4) An extension of the term of deposit that expires twelve (12)
months after the date the initial term of deposit under
subdivision (3) expires.
(b) If the permit has not expired or reverted to the commission,
a permit holder may withdraw a permit that is deposited with the
commission and make the permit active at any time before the
term of deposit expires, subject to any requirements of the
commission.
Sec. 2. (a) A permit reverts to the commission if:
(1) a term of deposit under section 1(a) of this chapter expires
without the commission approving an extension of the term;
and
(2) the permit is not active.
(b) At least ninety (90) days before the date that a term of
deposit expires, the commission shall provide written notice to the
permit holder of the date that:
(1) the term of deposit expires; and
(2) the permit will revert to the commission if:
(A) the permit is not active; or
(B) an extension of the term of deposit has not been
approved by the commission.
Sec. 3. This section sets out the procedure for a permit holder to
request deposit of a permit or extension of a term of deposit. A
permit holder must do the following:
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(1) Submit the permit holder's request for deposit or an
extension of the term of deposit to the commission in writing.
A permit holder must submit a request for extension at least
sixty (60) days before the term of deposit expires.
(2) To make an initial request for deposit of a permit, submit
documentation of the following:
(A) The specific reasons why the business for which the
permit was issued is not immediately operational.
(B) A timetable for making the business and the permit
active.
(C) A detailed statement of the permit holder's efforts to
make the business operational and the permit active.
(3) To request an extension of a term of deposit, appear at a
public meeting of the commission and provide to the
commission's satisfaction an explanation of the following:
(A) The specific reasons why the business for which the
permit was issued is not immediately operational.
(B) A timetable for making the business operational and
the permit active.
(C) A detailed statement of the permit holder's efforts to
make the business operational and the permit active.
(4) Submit to the commission any other documentation of the
permit holder's efforts under subdivision (3)(C), including:
(A) contracts for construction or renovation of the permit
premises;
(B) zoning applications and approvals; and
(C) building permits and any other necessary government
approvals.
(5) If the commission approves the permit holder's initial
request for deposit or request for an extension of a term of
deposit, pay any permit renewal fees that are due.
Sec. 4. The commission shall send a notice by mail or electronic
mail to a person of:
(1) the commission's approval or denial of a request for
deposit or extension of a term of deposit; and
(2) if the permit holder's request is approved:
(A) the date that the term of deposit expires; and
(B) any fees that are due and payable by the permit holder.
A person adversely affected by the commission's determination
under this chapter may seek judicial review of the determination
under IC 4-21.5.
Chapter 8. Suspension, Revocation, and Reinstatement of
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


Permits
Sec. 1. (a) The commission may suspend or revoke a hemp
permit if the permit holder fails to pay a civil penalty ordered by
the commission.
(b) Before enforcing the imposition of a civil penalty or
suspending or revoking a hemp permit, the commission shall:
(1) provide written notice of the alleged violation to the permit
holder; and
(2) conduct a hearing.
(c) If the commission:
(1) imposes a civil penalty; or
(2) suspends or revokes a hemp permit;
the commission shall issue a written notice to the permit holder
within ten (10) business days.
(d) The commission shall suspend a hemp permit for ninety (90)
days if the commission finds by a preponderance of the evidence
that the permit holder has committed a crime or that a crime was
committed on the premises of the hemp permit holder.
Sec. 2. (a) If a permit has expired or been suspended under this
article, the commission may not reinstate or renew the permit until
the permit holder has paid all civil penalties imposed by the
commission.
(b) The failure to pay a civil penalty described in subsection (a),
after ninety (90) days, is a Class B infraction.
(c) If the commission has revoked a hemp permit, the
commission may not reinstate or renew the permit until at least
one hundred eighty (180) days after the revocation. The
commission may reinstate an expired or revoked permit if the
applicant demonstrates that the applicant will:
(1) exercise due diligence on the applicant's premises; and
(2) properly supervise and train the applicant's employees or
agents that will handle the hemp derived cannabinoid
products.
(d) If a permit is reinstated or renewed under this section, the
applicant must pay a new nonrefundable application fee of two
hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(e) As a condition of reinstatement of a hemp permit, the permit
holder must train its employees on the laws and rules governing the
proper handling of hemp derived cannabinoid products in Indiana.
Chapter 9. Manufacturer Permits
Sec. 1. (a) A person shall not manufacture a hemp derived
cannabinoid product without holding a valid hemp manufacturer
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


permit issued by the commission.
(b) A hemp manufacturer shall only purchase hemp from a
person licensed to grow hemp under IC 15-15-13.
Sec. 2. (a) The commission may issue a hemp derived
cannabinoid products manufacturer permit only to a person who:
(1) intends to manufacture hemp derived cannabinoid
products;
(2) owns or operates a premises consisting of a permanent
building or structures in which hemp derived cannabinoid
products can be manufactured; and
(3) meets the commission's requirements for a hemp derived
cannabinoid products manufacturer permit.
(b) The commission shall charge one thousand dollars ($1,000)
for a hemp derived cannabinoid products manufacturer permit
annually. The commission shall deposit this fee in the hemp derived
cannabinoid products fund established by IC 7.1-8-16.
(c) A hemp manufacturer may only sell hemp derived
cannabinoid products to a hemp distributor permit holder.
(d) A hemp manufacturer may only manufacture hemp derived
cannabinoid products in Indiana.
Chapter 10. Distributor Permits
Sec. 1. (a) A person shall not purchase hemp derived
cannabinoid products from a hemp manufacturer without holding
a valid hemp distributor permit issued by the commission.
(b) A person shall not sell hemp derived cannabinoid products
to a hemp retailer without holding a valid hemp distributor permit
issued by the commission.
(c) A person shall not distribute hemp derived cannabinoid
products without holding a valid hemp distributor permit issued by
the commission.
Sec. 2. (a) The commission may issue a hemp distributor permit
to a person who intends to distribute hemp derived cannabinoid
products and meets the commission's requirements for a hemp
derived cannabinoid products distributor permit.
(b) The commission shall charge seven hundred fifty dollars
($750) for a hemp distributor permit annually.
(c) A hemp distributor may only sell hemp derived cannabinoid
products to a hemp retail permit holder.
(d) A hemp distributor may only buy hemp derived cannabinoid
products from a hemp manufacturer permit holder.
Chapter 11. Retail Permits
Sec. 1. (a) A hemp retail permit holder under this chapter may
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


only purchase hemp derived cannabinoid products from a hemp
distributor holding a valid hemp distributor permit issued by the
commission.
(b) A person may only purchase hemp derived cannabinoid
products from a hemp distributor if the person holds a hemp retail
permit.
(c) A person may only sell:
(1) a hemp derived cannabinoid product; and
(2) a CBD product;
to a member of the public if the person holds a valid hemp derived
cannabinoid products retail permit issued by the commission.
Sec. 2. (a) The commission may issue a hemp derived
cannabinoid products retail permit to a person who:
(1) intends to sell hemp derived cannabinoid products; and
(2) meets the commission's requirements for a hemp derived
cannabinoid products retail permit.
(b) The commission shall charge five hundred fifty dollars
($550) for a hemp derived cannabinoid products retail permit
annually. The commission shall deposit this fee in the hemp derived
cannabinoid products fund established by IC 7.1-8-16.
Sec. 3. (a) It is a Class C infraction for a hemp retail permit
holder or an employee or agent of a hemp retail permit holder to
recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally sell, barter, exchange,
provide, or furnish another person who is or reasonably appears
to be less than forty (40) years of age a hemp derived cannabinoid
product without first requiring the person to produce:
(1) a driver's license;
(2) an identification card issued under IC 9-24-16-1 or a
similar card issued under the laws of another state or the
federal government; or
(3) a government issued document;
bearing the person's photograph and birth date showing that the
person is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(b) A hemp retail permit holder does not need to request the
identification of an individual to purchase a CBD product, as
defined in IC 7.1-8-2-3.
Sec. 4. A hemp retail permit holder must pay state sales tax on
all products that the retail permit holder sells.
Sec. 5. A hemp retail permit holder may not operate from a
location that is within one thousand (1,000) feet of the perimeter of:
(1) a school;
(2) a playground;
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(3) a child care center;
(4) a library; or
(5) a government owned or operated property.
Sec. 6. A hemp retail permit holder shall prohibit the onsite
consumption of hemp derived cannabinoid products on the hemp
permit holder's premises.
Sec. 7. A hemp retail permit holder may not deliver hemp
derived cannabinoid products to any customer.
Sec. 8. The sale of hemp derived cannabinoid products on the
Internet is expressly prohibited. Unless specifically granted
authority by a statute passed by the general assembly, the
commission shall not allow the operation of or authorize online sale
of hemp derived cannabinoid products.
Chapter 12. Carrier Permits
Sec. 1. (a) The commission may issue a hemp carrier permit to
a person who:
(1) intends to transport hemp or hemp derived cannabinoid
products:
(A) between a hemp grower, licensed under IC 15-15-13-7
and a hemp manufacturer;
(B) between a hemp manufacturer and a hemp distributor;
(C) between a hemp distributor and a hemp retailer; or
(D) between Indiana and another state; and
(2) meets the commission's requirements for a hemp carrier
permit.
(b) A person transporting industrial hemp, as defined in
IC 35-48-8-5, is exempt under this article but must obtain a hemp
handler permit under IC 15-15-13-7 to transport industrial hemp.
Sec. 2. (a) An applicant for a carrier permit under this chapter
must submit to the commission the description of the applicant's
vehicle including:
(1) the date of manufacture of the vehicle;
(2) the vehicle's approximate weight;
(3) the vehicle's vehicle identification number (VIN);
(4) the vehicle's license plate number;
(5) the vehicle's capacity; and
(6) other information that the commission requires by rule.
(b) An applicant for a carrier permit under this chapter must
submit a surety bond in a penal sum of a minimum of five thousand
dollars ($5,000), executed by the applicant and payable to the state
of Indiana, to the commission. The bond shall be conditioned that
the applicant will not violate a provision of this title, or a rule or
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


regulation of the commission. The commission shall duly execute
and approve the bond.
(c) A separate carrier permit is required for each vehicle that is
used to transport hemp derived cannabinoid products.
(d) The driver of the vehicle transporting hemp derived
cannabinoid products must possess the carrier permit.
(e) If a driver fails to possess a carrier permit while
transporting hemp or hemp derived cannabinoid products, a law
enforcement officer may seize, embargo, or retain any hemp
derived cannabinoid products in the vehicle.
Sec. 3. The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
require an applicant for a carrier permit under this chapter to
demonstrate reliability and responsibility.
Sec. 4. (a) The commission shall charge a fee of two hundred
fifty dollars ($250) for a hemp carrier permit annually.
(b) The commission shall deposit a fee received under subsection
(a) in the hemp derived cannabinoid products fund established by
IC 7.1-8-16.
Chapter 13. Labeling
Sec. 1. (a) A hemp manufacturer may only sell a hemp derived
cannabinoid product to a hemp distributor if the hemp derived
cannabinoid product is labeled in accordance with this chapter.
(b) A hemp distributor may only distribute a hemp derived
cannabinoid product to a hemp retailer if the hemp derived
cannabinoid product is labeled in accordance with this chapter.
(c) A hemp retailer may only sell a hemp derived cannabinoid
product to a member of the public if the container or packaging of
the hemp derived cannabinoid product contains a label that is in
accordance with this chapter.
(d) If a person violates this chapter:
(1) a law enforcement officer shall seize any improperly
labeled products; and
(2) the commission may revoke the person's permit issued
under this article.
(e) A product seized under subsection (d)(1) is presumed to be
marijuana as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29.
Sec. 2. (a) A label on a hemp derived cannabinoid product must
be conspicuous and include the following information:
(1) The batch number.
(2) The hemp derived cannabinoid product permit number.
(3) If at the manufacturing stage, the hemp manufacturer's
permit number.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(4) If at the distribution stage, the hemp manufacturer's and
the distributor's permit numbers.
(5) If at the retail stage, the hemp manufacturer's permit
number, the hemp distributor's permit number, and the hemp
retailer's permit number.
(6) The weight of the product.
(7) Test results from a Hemp Analytical Testing Laboratory
registered with the federal Drug Enforcement Administration,
indicating the:
(A) percentage amount of each cannabinoid strain,
including THC and cannabidiol, present in the hemp
derived cannabinoid product; and
(B) number of milligrams of each cannabinoid strain,
including THC and cannabidiol, present in the hemp
derived cannabinoid product.
(8) A QR code that links to the commission's online data base
with the certificate of analysis for the testing of the hemp
derived cannabinoid product.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (b), that the product is
legally available only to an individual who is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
(10) The following statement: "THE STATE OF INDIANA
HEALTH WARNING: Hemp derived cannabinoid products
can be addictive and impair an individual's ability to drive a
motor vehicle or operate heavy machinery. Smoking can lead
to an increased risk for cancer, tachycardia, hypertension,
heart attack, and lung infection. These products may also
affect the health of a pregnant woman and the unborn child.
KEEP OUT OF THE REACH OF CHILDREN.".
(b) Subsection (a)(9) does not apply to CBD products, as defined
in IC 7.1-8-2-3.
Chapter 14. Containers
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "container" has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-48-8-2.
Sec. 2. A person may not manufacture, sell, or distribute a hemp
derived cannabinoid product unless the product is contained in
child resistant packaging.
Sec. 3. (a) If the commission discovers any hemp derived
cannabinoid product sold or distributed in violation of this article,
the commission may seize and take possession of the product. The
commission shall destroy all products seized under this subsection.
(b) The commission may impose a civil penalty on any person
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


who sells or distributes a hemp derived cannabinoid product in
violation of this article. However, the civil penalty may not exceed
the greater of:
(1) five hundred percent (500%) of the retail value of the
product sold or distributed in violation of this chapter; or
(2) five thousand dollars ($5,000).
Chapter 15. Laboratories
Sec. 1. (a) The state police department shall publish on the
department's website the list of Hemp Analytical Testing
Laboratories registered with the federal Drug Enforcement
Administration licensed to test hemp for THC concentration in
Indiana.
(b) The commission shall notify the state police department if a
laboratory listed under subsection (a) has failed to comply with this
article.
(c) The state police department shall delete a laboratory from
the list described in subsection (a) after receiving a notification
under subsection (b).
Sec. 2. A hemp manufacturer must test each hemp derived
cannabinoid product that the hemp manufacturer produces at a
Hemp Analytical Testing Laboratory registered with the federal
Drug Enforcement Administration and listed on the state police
department's website.
Sec. 3. A hemp manufacturer must submit the following to the
commission:
(1) The certificate of analysis for each product tested by a
laboratory under section 2 of this chapter.
(2) The name of the laboratory that tested the product.
(3) The license number of the laboratory that tested the
product.
(4) A draft of a label that complies with IC 7.1-8-13.
(5) The address of the hemp manufacturer.
(6) The percentage of every cannabinoid contained in the
product.
(7) The terpenoid type and concentration used.
(8) The residual solvents and processing chemicals used.
(9) Any residual pesticides used.
(10) Any heavy metals contained the product.
(11) Any microbial impurities in the product.
(12) Any mycotoxins present in the product.
(13) Any water activity.
(14) Any yeast and mold in the product.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(15) A statement indicating whether vitamin E acetate is in
the product.
(16) The hemp grower's license number.
Sec. 4. The commission shall publish information compiled
under section 3 of this chapter in the commission's data base for
hemp derived cannabinoid products and post this information on
the commission's website.
Sec. 5. (a) A hemp manufacturer, a hemp distributor, or a hemp
retailer may not sell a hemp derived cannabinoid product that is
not properly tested under section 2 of this chapter.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally falsifies or alters
a certificate of analysis is subject to criminal prosecution under
IC 35-43-5-4.
(c) A hemp derived cannabinoid product with a falsified or
altered certificate of analysis is to be considered marijuana (as
defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29).
Sec. 6. (a) A laboratory testing hemp under this chapter must
submit to the hemp manufacturer each certificate of analysis that
it performs.
(b) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
Chapter 16. Hemp Derived Cannabinoid Products Fund
Sec. 1. (a) The hemp derived cannabinoid products fund is
established as a dedicated fund administered by the state budget
agency.
(b) All money received by the commission for deposit in the
hemp derived cannabinoid products fund shall be deposited in the
fund.
(c) The commission shall deposit in the fund all:
(1) fees for permits received under this article; and
(2) application fees received under this article.
(d) No portion of the fund shall revert to the state general fund
at the end of a state fiscal year. However, if the fund is abolished,
its contents shall revert to the state general fund.
(e) All money accruing in the fund is continuously appropriated
for the purposes in this chapter.
Sec. 2. In each state fiscal year, the prior state fiscal year
collections accrued to the fund shall be used by the commission as
follows:
(1) Seventy percent (70%) by the commission for the
administration of the purposes of this article.
(2) Twenty percent (20%) pursuant to the hemp derived
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


products law enforcement program as described in section 3
of this chapter.
(3) Five percent (5%) to the division of mental health and
addiction to provide funding for the 988 suicide and crisis
hotline.
(4) Five percent (5%) to the state general fund.
Sec. 3. (a) The hemp derived cannabinoid products law
enforcement program is established and shall be administered by
the commission.
(b) The state budget agency may distribute funds as part of the
hemp derived cannabinoid products law enforcement program as
follows:
(1) To the state police department for the following:
(A) Funding ARIDE training at the Indiana state police
department academy.
(B) Purchasing oral fluid testing material for roadside
hemp and cannabis testing.
(C) The destruction of confiscated or illegal hemp derived
cannabinoid products.
(D) Funding other items necessary to enforce this article.
(2) To local law enforcement agencies for oral fluid testing
material for roadside hemp and cannabis testing.
(3) To prosecuting attorneys for the following:
(A) Training programs.
(B) Legal and court costs associated with the prosecution
of violations related to hemp derived cannabinoid products
or marijuana.
(C) Other items necessary to enforce this article.
Chapter 17. Advertising
Sec. 1. (a) A permit holder under this article shall not engage in
any advertising of hemp derived cannabinoid products or a
business that sells hemp derived cannabinoid products that:
(1) is false or misleading;
(2) promotes overconsumption of hemp derived cannabinoid
products;
(3) depicts actual consumption of hemp derived cannabinoid
products;
(4) depicts a person less than twenty-one (21) years of age;
(5) makes any health, medical, or therapeutic claims about
cannabis or hemp derived cannabinoid products;
(6) uses the image of a cannabis leaf or bud;
(7) includes any image designed or likely to appeal to minors;
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(8) uses items such as toys or inflatables, movie or cartoon
characters, or any other depiction or image likely to be
appealing to children, if the item, image, or depiction suggests
an intent to cause children to become interested in the
purchase or consumption of hemp derived cannabinoid
products; or
(9) uses or employs a commercial mascot outside of, and in
proximity to, a permitted business.
(b) A permit holder shall not place or pay for any advertising of
hemp derived cannabinoid products or a business that sells hemp
derived cannabinoid products within one thousand (1,000) feet of
the perimeter of:
(1) a school;
(2) a playground;
(3) a child care center;
(4) a library; or
(5) a government owned or government operated property.
(c) A permit holder shall not place or pay for any advertising of
hemp derived cannabinoid products or a business that sells hemp
derived cannabinoid products:
(1) on or in a private vehicle;
(2) on or in a public transit vehicle;
(3) at a public transit shelter;
(4) at a bus stop;
(5) at a taxi stand;
(6) in a train station; or
(7) in an airport.
(d) The commission may assess a penalty of two thousand
dollars ($2,000) per day for a violation under this chapter.
Chapter 18. Product Testing
Sec. 1. The commission may do spot testing of hemp derived
cannabinoid products to ensure compliance with this article.
Sec. 2. (a) If the commission tests a hemp derived cannabinoid
product that:
(1) was manufactured, distributed, or sold by a permit holder;
or
(2) is for sale by a permit holder;
the permit holder shall pay the commissioner two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) for each test.
(b) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2
concerning the recall of hemp derived cannabinoid products due
to:
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(1) improper or false labeling; or
(2) health and safety concerns.
(c) The commission may adopt a rule under IC 4-22-2 to
increase the fee described in subsection (a) if the testing costs
exceed the fee.
Chapter 19. Enforcement Actions
Sec. 1. If the commission, the state police department, a federal
law enforcement agency, or a local law enforcement agency finds
that a permit holder possesses a product that purports to be a
hemp derived cannabinoid product and does not meet the
requirements of this article, the product is considered to be
marijuana (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29). The commission, state
police department, federal law enforcement agency, or local law
enforcement agency may:
(1) detain, seize, or embargo the product;
(2) seize the building containing the product; and
(3) seize the vehicle used to transport or store the product.
Chapter 20. Crimes
Sec. 1.(a) A person who knowingly or intentionally transports
hemp derived cannabinoid products:
(1) between a hemp manufacturer and a hemp distributor; or
(2) between a hemp distributor and a hemp retailer;
without holding a valid hemp derived cannabinoid products carrier
permit commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally transports a hemp
derived cannabinoid product into or through Indiana that was
manufactured outside of Indiana commits a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) The commission may revoke the person's hemp carrier
permit for violating this section.
Sec. 2. A law enforcement agency may seize hemp or hemp
derived cannabinoid products that are being transported in
violation of this article.
Sec. 3. (a) It is unlawful for a person to possess an article,
instrument, imitation, or counterfeit of a permit issued under this
article, other than a permit lawfully issued to the person and which
the person is lawfully entitled to possess.
(b) It is unlawful for a person to display an imitation or
counterfeit of a permit issued under this article for the purpose of
defrauding the state of the payment of a tax or permit fee imposed
by this title.
(c) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates subsection
(a) or (b) commits a Class A misdemeanor. However, the offense is
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


a Level 6 felony after the first offense.
Sec. 4. A person who knowingly or intentionally sells or offers
to sell a hemp derived cannabinoid product over the Internet or by
delivery commits a Class A misdemeanor.
Sec. 5. A person who knowingly or intentionally sells a hemp
derived cannabinoid product that has been recalled under
IC 7.1-8-18 commits a Class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 6. A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this
article commits a deceptive act that is actionable by the attorney
general under IC 24-5-0.5 and is subject to the penalties listed in
IC 24-5-0.5.
SECTION 11. IC 9-13-2-86, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 82, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 86. "Intoxicated" means under the influence of:
(1) alcohol;
(2) a controlled substance (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1);
(3) a drug other than alcohol or a controlled substance;
(4) a substance described in IC 35-46-6-2 or IC 35-46-6-3;
(5) a combination of substances described in subdivisions (1)
through (4); any amount of tetrahydrocannabinol; or
(6) any other substance, not including food and food ingredients
(as defined in IC 6-2.5-1-20), tobacco (as defined in
IC 6-2.5-1-28), or a dietary supplement (as defined in
IC 6-2.5-1-16); or
(7) any combination of substances listed in subdivisions (1)
through (6);
so that there is an impaired condition of thought and action and the loss
of normal control of a person's faculties.
SECTION 12. IC 9-13-2-160.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 160.5. "Schedule I drug", for
purposes of this title, includes marijuana (as defined in
IC 35-48-1.1-29), hemp (as defined in IC 35-48-8-3), and
tetrahydrocannbinol (as defined in IC 7.1-1-3-46.5).
SECTION 13. IC 15-15-13-0.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.165-2014,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. (a) The state seed commissioner shall
administer this chapter.
(b) The state seed commissioner shall share information
regarding the hemp program established under this chapter with
the state police department.
(c) The state seed commissioner shall report and provide to the
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


United States Secretary of Agriculture required information under
7 CFR 990.7 within thirty (30) days of the information being
received.
SECTION 14. IC 15-15-13-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Nothing in this chapter authorizes any
person to violate any federal law or regulation.
(b) Any state hemp grow programs may not operate above
federal restrictions or limitations.
(b) (c) Nothing in this chapter authorizes the state seed
commissioner to regulate a hemp product or a hemp derived
cannabinoid product under IC 7.1-8.
SECTION 15. IC 15-15-13-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "crop" means any hemp
grown under a single hemp grower's license issued under this
chapter.
SECTION 16. IC 15-15-13-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. "Grow site" means any place
or location, either indoors or outdoors, where a hemp crop is
legally grown.
SECTION 17. IC 15-15-13-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "grower" means:
(1) an individual, a partnership, a company, or a corporation that
produces grows industrial hemp; for commercial purposes; or
(2) a person, as part of a hemp research program conducted by a
state educational institution (as defined by IC 21-7-13-32).
SECTION 18. IC 15-15-13-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this chapter, "handler" means an
individual, a partnership, a company, or a corporation that receives
industrial hemp for scientific research, or for processing into
agricultural commodities, industrial hemp, products, or agricultural
hemp seed.
(b) The term does not include a person processing or handling
hemp derived cannabinoid products under IC 7.1-8.
SECTION 19. IC 15-15-13-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "hemp" means the plant
Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts,
and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than
three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis, for any part
of the Cannabis sativa L. plant. has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-48-8-3.
SECTION 20. IC 15-15-13-6.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.3. As used in this chapter,
"remediate" means the process of rendering noncompliant hemp
compliant by:
(1) removing and destroying flower material, while retaining
stalk, stems, leaf material, and seeds; or
(2) shredding the entire plant into a biomass like material,
then retesting the shredded biomass material for compliance.
SECTION 21. IC 15-15-13-6.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 104, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. As used in this chapter, "hemp
derived cannabinoid product" means a product derived from, or made
by, processing hemp plants or plant parts including derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers.
However, the term does not include:
(1) smokable hemp (as defined by IC 35-48-1.1-38); or
(2) products that contain a total delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration of more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) by
weight. has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-8-4.
SECTION 22. IC 15-15-13-6.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.6. (a) As used in this chapter,
"industrial hemp" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-8-5.
(b) The term includes hemp as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29.
SECTION 23. IC 15-15-13-6.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.7. As used in this chapter,
"industrial hemp production site" means a location where
industrial hemp may be processed, stored, staged, delivered, or
received.
SECTION 24. IC 15-15-13-6.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.8. As used in this chapter,
"licensee" means a person who is licensed by the state seed
commissioner under this chapter including:
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(1) a grower;
(2) a handler; or
(3) a grower and a handler.
SECTION 25. IC 15-15-13-6.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.9. As used in this chapter, "lot"
means a contiguous area in a field, greenhouse, or indoor growing
structure containing the same variety or strain of cannabis
throughout the area.
SECTION 26. IC 15-15-13-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Subject to section 15 of this chapter, the
production of, possession of, scientific study of, and commerce in hemp
and industrial hemp is authorized in Indiana. Hemp is subject to
regulation by the state seed commissioner. The state seed
commissioner shall adopt rules to oversee the licensing, production,
and management of:
(1) hemp; and
(2) agricultural hemp seed. implement this chapter.
(b) All growers and handlers of industrial hemp must have a hemp
license issued by the state seed commissioner. Growers and handlers
engaged in the production of agricultural hemp seed must also have an
agricultural a hemp seed production grower's license. A contract
grower, hemp cooperative, or a similar entity to a contract grower
or hemp cooperative must be licensed to grow hemp or to handle
industrial hemp.
(c) The state seed commissioner may issue the following hemp
licenses:
(1) A hemp grower's license, to a person who conducts the
activities of a grower including farming or propagating of
hemp.
(2) A hemp handler's license, to a person who transports
industrial hemp, in any quantity, stage, and for any purpose.
(d) A hemp handler is exempt from having to obtain a carrier
permit under IC 7.1-8-12.
(e) The state seed commissioner may issue both licenses listed
under subsection (c) to the same person. The possession of one (1)
license does not mean a person possesses the other license.
(f) A hemp grower's or hemp handler's license does not allow
the person holding the license to produce hemp derived
cannabinoid products under IC 7.1-8.
(c) (g) An application for a hemp license or agricultural hemp seed
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


production license under this chapter must include the following:
(1) The name and address of the applicant.
(2) The name and address of the hemp operation business of the
applicant.
(3) The global positioning system coordinates, including the
geospatial decimal format, and legal description of the property
used for the hemp operation. following:
(A) Site by field.
(B) Storage site.
(C) Receiving site.
(D) Staging site.
(E) Sites similar to the sites listed in clauses (A) through
(D).
(4) If the hemp license or agricultural hemp seed production
license application is made by a grower, the acreage size of the
field where the hemp will be grown.
(5) A statement signed by the applicant, under penalty of perjury,
that the person applying for the hemp license or agricultural hemp
seed production license has not been convicted, of a drug related
felony or misdemeanor in the previous ten (10) within five (5)
years of the application date, of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1)
year;
(B) a felony drug related misdemeanor under Indiana law;
or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty
equal to the penalty for a felony;
for which the applicant's conviction has not been expunged
under IC 35-38-9.
(6) A written consent allowing the state police department to
conduct a state or national criminal history background check.
(7) A written consent that the applicant expressly consents for
a one (1) year duration and for an additional one (1) year
after the applicant's permit expires allowing to allow the state
police department, the state seed commissioner, or the state seed
commissioner's authorized representative, if a license is issued to
the applicant, upon the issuance of a license to the applicant, to
conduct aerial inspections and to enter the premises on which the
hemp is grown to conduct physical inspections of hemp planted
and grown by the applicant, and to ensure the plants meet the
definition of hemp as set forth in section 6 of this chapter.
(8) A nonrefundable application fee, which must include the
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


amount necessary to conduct a state or national criminal history
background check, in an amount determined by the state seed
commissioner.
(8) An attestation and declaration that the applicant will use
a Hemp Analytical Testing Laboratory registered with the
United States Drug Enforcement Administration to conduct
analytical testing for total THC.
(9) A crop testing plan that includes:
(A) regular monitoring by the grower or receiving handler
of the crop during growth; and
(B) a plan to take the crop down if the crop trends in
exceedance of the acceptable THC level.
(10) The intended purpose of growing the crop, including for,
but not limited to:
(A) CBD;
(B) fiber;
(C) grain;
(D) oil; or
(E) hemp derived cannabinoid products.
(11) The variety or strain of Cannabis sativa L. to be grown.
(12) A crop monitoring plan to comply with state and federal
law to avoid exceeding three-tenths of one percent (0.3%)
total THC.
(13) The annual harvest and disposal report on a form created
and provided by the state seed commissioner.
(14) If the applicant is growing hemp for a research purpose,
the applicant must include a research proposal of adequate
verbiage to clearly explain the intent of the research and the
anticipated outcome.
(15) If the applicant is growing industrial hemp, the applicant
must include the location of the industrial hemp production
site including the county and geospatial location coordinates
in decimal format.
(9) (16) Any other information required by the state seed
commissioner.
(h) Except as provided in subsection (g), a business making an
application for a hemp license must also identify the key
individuals in the business including:
(1) a sole proprietor;
(2) a partner in partnership; and
(3) an individual with executive managerial control in the
business or corporation including a:
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(A) chief executive officer;
(B) chief operating officer; or
(C) a chief financial officer.
(i) An individual described in subsection (h) must also submit a
criminal background check.
(j) A key individual does not include nonexecutive managers
including farm, field, or shift managers.
(k) If an applicant fails to provide a report under subsection
(g)(13), the state seed commissioner shall deny the applicant's
request for a license renewal.
(l) The state seed commissioner shall assess a nonrefundable fee
of five hundred dollars ($500) for an applicant.
(m) The state seed commissioner may assess a fee of one
hundred dollars ($100), on behalf of the state police department, to
conduct criminal background checks on an applicant.
SECTION 27. IC 15-15-13-7.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. The state seed commissioner
may not issue a license under this chapter to an individual who:
(1) does not provide the required information under section
7 of this chapter;
(2) is less than twenty-one (21) years of age;
(3) is not registered with the secretary of state to do business
in Indiana;
(4) does not have lawful status, as defined in IC 9-13-2-92.3;
(5) has been convicted within five (5) years of the application
date of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1)
year;
(B) a felony or a drug related misdemeanor under Indiana
law; or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty
equal to the penalty for a felony;
and the conviction has not been expunged under IC 35-38-9;
or
(6) is non compos mentis.
SECTION 28. IC 15-15-13-7.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.6. (a) A licensee shall ensure
that their employees, volunteers, family members, or others
servicing a hemp production site, and subject to the management
of the licensee, comply with the requirements of Indiana law.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(b) A licensee may not conduct any hemp activity on property
owned by, leased from, or previously submitted in a hemp
application by any person if the state seed commissioner denied the
person's hemp license application or revoked the person's hemp
license for any of the following reasons:
(1) The failure to obtain a criminal background check.
(2) The failure to comply with an order from the state seed
commissioner.
(c) A licensee must report hemp crop acreage to the Farm
Services Agency (FSA) and to the Agricultural Marketing Service,
including the following:
(1) Street address, if available, and geospatial location for
each production or grow site where hemp will be grown or
handled.
(2) Outdoor acreage or indoor square footage dedicated to the
growing of hemp.
(3) License number of the grower.
(4) The purpose of the crop as fiber, grain, CBD, or another
specified use.
(d) A grower who is aware that a hemp crop grown under their
license exceeds the acceptable hemp THC level, whether notified by
the state seed commissioner or not, must:
(1) secure the crop;
(2) harvest the crop within thirty (30) days of sampling;
(3) transport the crop to a state seed commissioner approved
Indiana reverse distributor;
(4) remediate the crop under the direction and supervision of
the state seed commissioner's office;
(5) dispose of the crop in a designated site in a manner that
complies with local and state burn laws; and
(6) verify the disposal of the crop with the state seed
commissioner.
(e) If a grower remediates a crop under this section, the grower
must have the crop tested for THC concentration levels and send
the results to the state seed commissioner. A crop may only enter
the stream of commerce if the hemp is below the acceptable THC
concentration levels.
(f) A grower must report to the state seed commissioner if the
purpose of the crop changes, or if a different varietal is used, ten
(10) days after the receipt of seed or clones.
SECTION 29. IC 15-15-13-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 62, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Each license application received under this
chapter must be processed as follows:
(1) (a) Upon receipt of a license application, the state seed
commissioner shall do one (1) of the following:
(A) forward a copy of the application to the state police
department. The state police department shall do the following:
(i) (1) Perform a state or national criminal history background
check of the applicant.
(ii) (2) Determine if the requirements under section 7(c)(5)
7(g)(5) of this chapter concerning prior criminal convictions have
been met.
(iii) (3) Return the application to the state seed commissioner
along with the state police department's determinations and a copy
of the state or national criminal history background check.
(B) Do the following:
(i) Perform a state or national criminal history background
check of the applicant under the same standards as the state
police department would perform.
(ii) Determine if the requirements under section 7(c)(5) of
this chapter concerning prior criminal convictions have been
met.
(2) (b) The state seed commissioner shall review the license
application and the criminal history background check.
(b) (c) If the state seed commissioner determines that all the
requirements under this chapter have been met and that a license
should be granted to the applicant, the state seed commissioner shall
approve the application for issuance of a license.
(d) The state seed commissioner must approve an application
before an applicant can conduct any hemp activity.
(c) (e) A hemp license or agricultural hemp seed production license
under this chapter expires on December 31 of the year for which the
license was issued, unless revoked. A hemp license or agricultural
hemp seed production license may be renewed in accordance with rules
adopted by the state seed commissioner and is nontransferable.
(f) A license is nontransferable.
(g) A license may be renewed annually.
SECTION 30. IC 15-15-13-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) An agricultural hemp seed production
license issued under this chapter authorizes a grower or handler to
produce and handle agricultural hemp seed for sale to licensed hemp
growers and handlers. A seller of agricultural hemp seed shall ensure
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


that the seed complies with any standards set by the state seed
commissioner. The state seed commissioner shall make available to
growers information that identifies sellers of agricultural hemp seed.
(b) (a) A person who sells agricultural hemp seed to a grower must
be a seed distributor who has a permit under IC 15-15-1-34.
(c) (b) All growers and handlers must keep All records in
accordance with rules adopted by the state seed commissioner. related
to hemp, industrial hemp, and agricultural hemp seed must be
retained by the state seed commissioner, an applicant, and a
licensee for at least five (5) years. Upon at least three (3) days notice,
the state seed commissioner may audit the required records during
normal business hours. The state seed commissioner may conduct an
audit periodic audits on a licensee for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with:
(1) this chapter;
(2) rules adopted by the state seed commissioner; or
(3) hemp license or agricultural hemp seed production license
requirements, terms, and conditions.
(d) In addition to an audit conducted in accordance with subsection
(c), The state seed commissioner may inspect independently, or in
cooperation with the state police department, a federal law enforcement
agency, or a local law enforcement agency, any hemp crop during the
crop's growth phase and take a representative composite sample for
field analysis. If a crop contains an average
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol total tetrahydrocannabinol (THC)
concentration exceeding three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry
weight basis, the state seed commissioner may detain, seize, or
embargo the crop.
(e) The state seed commissioner may revoke a license issued under
this chapter to a person that fails to cooperate with:
(1) the state seed commissioner;
(2) the state police;
(3) a federal law enforcement agency; or
(4) a local law enforcement agency; or
(5) a person making an official inspection or taking of a
sample of a hemp crop during the crop's growth phase.
in an inspection, or in the taking of a sample, under subsection (d).
(f) The state seed commissioner may revoke the license of a
licensee that grows, sells, or distributes hemp for the following:
(1) The licensee has not:
(A) complied with the requirements under this chapter; or
(B) submitted reports required by the state seed
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


commissioner.
(2) The licensee falsified information.
(3) The licensee failed to follow labeling requirements.
(4) The licensee is convicted of violating any Indiana law.
(g) If the state seed commissioner revokes a license, the state
seed commissioner shall issue a letter within ten (10) business days
to the licensee concerning the revocation.
(f) (h) A failure to cooperate described in subsection (e) constitutes
probable cause for the state seed commissioner, state police, federal
law enforcement agency, or local law enforcement agency to search the
premises of the licensee's hemp operation.
(g) (i) If the state police department, a federal law enforcement
agency, or a local law enforcement agency cooperates with the state
seed commissioner in the detention, seizure, or embargo of a crop
under this section:
(1) the state police department, federal law enforcement agency,
or local law enforcement agency; and
(2) any officer or employee of the state police department, federal
law enforcement agency, or local law enforcement agency who is
involved in the detention, seizure, or embargo;
is immune from civil liability for the detention, seizure, or embargo.
(h) (j) The state seed commissioner may order a hemp crop that is
detained, seized, or embargoed for noncompliance with this chapter to
be destroyed by the owner. However, except as prohibited by federal
law, the grower may appeal to the state seed commissioner for the
hemp crop to be diverted to a willing licensed processor for processing
and sale for industrial use. A hemp crop that is detained, seized, or
embargoed may not be used for cannabidiol, other extracts, oil, food,
or cosmetic products that are used for humans or animals.
(i) (k) A grower shall reimburse the state seed commissioner for the
cost of testing conducted on the grower's crop under this section.
SECTION 31. IC 15-15-13-9.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) A person who is a handler licensed under
this section may distribute clones and other nonseed propagative
materials of a hemp plant using the person's own labeling, if the
distributor does the following:
(1) Complies with the requirements of this chapter.
(2) Reports the variety and quantity of each variety of the
propagative material of plant sold.
(3) Pays the inspection fee on the basis of the report.
(4) Labels the propagative material with the information required
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


by the state seed commissioner.
(5) Keeps records to accurately determine the named varieties and
the number of plants of each variety distributed.
(6) Grants the state seed commissioner or the state seed
commissioner's authorized representative access to examine the
handler's records and verify the quantity and each variety of
propagative material distributed.
(7) Report, under oath, to the state seed commissioner on forms
furnished by the state seed commissioner each variety and
quantity of propagative material sold during each semiannual
period.
(8) Any other information or conditions stated in the application.
(b) The state seed commissioner may revoke a handler's license if
the commissioner determines any of the following:
(1) That the licensee has not complied with the requirements
under this chapter.
(2) The report required in subsection (a) has not been submitted
and is more than ten (10) days late.
(3) The report required in subsection (a) contained false
information.
(4) The labeling requirements under this chapter have not been
met.
(c) If the inspection fee has not been paid and is more than ten (10)
days late, the state seed commissioner shall assess a late fee.
(d) Each year the:
(1) report required under subsection (a)(7); and
(2) inspection fees required under this chapter;
for the period beginning on January 1 and ending on June 30 and for
the period beginning on July 1 and ending on December 31 are due not
more than thirty (30) days after the end of the semiannual period.
(e) A person holding a hemp handler's license must have in their
immediate possession, while transporting industrial hemp, a
physical document indicating that they have a handler license and
must provide the following to law enforcement when asked:
(1) Evidence of a valid hemp handler license from the state
seed commissioner.
(2) A valid driver's license that includes the driver's photo
and current legal address.
(3) An invoice or delivery document identifying the person to
whom the industrial hemp is to be delivered, including the
person's the full address and telephone number, and the
variety and quantity of the industrial hemp.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(4) A valid certificate of analysis issued by a state seed
commissioner approved laboratory showing the total THC for
the industrial hemp transported.
SECTION 32. IC 15-15-13-10 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 10. The amount of any fees charged growers and
handlers by the state seed commissioner under this chapter must be
sufficient to cover the cost of the administration of this chapter,
including the cost of conducting audits and testing.
SECTION 33. IC 15-15-13-10.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.1. (a) A licensee shall pay an
annual fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a license issued
under this chapter.
(b) The state seed commissioner may adopt rules, under
IC 4-22-2, to raise the annual fee as necessary.
SECTION 34. IC 15-15-13-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) Only a hemp handler licensee the
licensee's designee, or the licensee's agents may be permitted to
transport industrial hemp off a production site. When transporting
industrial hemp off the production site, the hemp handler licensee
designee, or agent shall have in the licensee's, designee's, or agent's
their possession the licensing documents from the state seed
commissioner evidencing that the industrial hemp is from certified
seed produced by a licensed grower.
(b) The state seed commissioner shall include:
(1) the license number of the grower that produced the hemp;
and
(2) the license number of the hemp handler;
in the licensing documents described in subsection (a).
SECTION 35. IC 15-15-13-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 63, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. The state seed commissioner is responsible for
the following:
(1) Monitoring the hemp grown by any hemp grower license
holder.
(2) Conducting random testing of the hemp for compliance with
tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) levels. The state seed commissioner
may enter into agreements with one (1) or more laboratories
selected by the Indiana state police department to perform testing
under this subdivision.
(3) Establishing necessary testing criteria and protocols, including
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


a procedure for testing, using post decarboxylation or other
similarly reliable methods, for delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of the hemp
produced.
(4) Establishing the minimum number of acres to be planted
under each license issued under this chapter.
(5) Regulating any propagative material of a hemp plant.
SECTION 36. IC 15-15-13-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) Subject to section 13.5 of this chapter, in
addition to any other liability or penalty provided by law, the state seed
commissioner may revoke or refuse to issue or renew a hemp license
or an agricultural hemp seed production license and may impose a civil
penalty for a violation of:
(1) a license requirement;
(2) license terms or conditions; or
(3) a rule relating to growing or handling hemp. or
(4) section 19 of this chapter.
(b) The state seed commissioner may not impose a civil penalty
under this section that exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars
($2,500).
(c) The state seed commissioner may revoke or refuse to issue or
renew a hemp license or an agricultural hemp seed production license
for a violation of any rule of the state seed commissioner that pertains
to agricultural operations or activities other than hemp growing or
handling.
(d) Any civil penalties collected under this section shall be
transferred to the Indiana state department of agriculture and used for
hemp marketing and research purposes. retained by the state seed
commissioner to pay expenses to implement this chapter.
(e) In addition to payment of any civil penalty imposed under this
section, a person who commits a violation described in subsection (a)
shall reimburse the state seed commissioner for any costs incurred by
the state seed commissioner for laboratory testing of material
pertaining to the violation.
SECTION 37. IC 15-15-13-13.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.156-2020,
SECTION 64, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13.5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), the
state seed commissioner shall give a person who negligently violates
this chapter a reasonable time, determined by the state seed
commissioner, ten (10) days to correct the violation without imposing
a penalty under section 13 of this chapter. However, the state seed
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


commissioner may require the person who committed the violation to
comply with a corrective action plan determined by the state seed
commissioner and report to the state seed commissioner on compliance
with the corrective action plan.
(b) A person who commits a negligent violation of this chapter three
(3) times in a five (5) year period shall immediately be ineligible to
produce hemp for five (5) ten (10) years.
(c) If the state seed commissioner believes determines that a person
has knowingly or intentionally violated this chapter, the state seed
commissioner shall notify:
(1) the superintendent of the state police department; and
(2) the sheriff of the county in which the violation occurred;
and
(2) (3) the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the
violation occurred;
of the violation within forty-eight (48) hours of making the
determination.
(d) A person who commits a negligent violation under this chapter
is subject to a late fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000). as established
by rule adopted by the state seed commissioner.
SECTION 38. IC 15-15-13-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2019,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) Before December 31, 2019, July 1, 2027,
the state seed commissioner, after consultation with the governor, the
director of the state department of agriculture, and the superintendent
of the state police department, shall submit a an updated plan that
monitors and regulates the production of hemp to the United States
Department of Agriculture. If the United States Department of
Agriculture disapproves the plan, the state seed commissioner shall
submit an amended plan to the United States Department of
Agriculture.
(b) The state seed commissioner may work with the United
States Department of Agriculture to update the plan described in
subsection (a), to conform with federal law.
SECTION 39. IC 15-15-13-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.29-2024,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) The state seed commissioner shall pay all
fees collected under this chapter to the treasurer of Purdue University.
(b) The board of trustees of Purdue University shall expend the fees
on proper vouchers filed with the treasurer of Purdue University. The
treasurer shall pay vouchers for the following expenses:
(1) The employment of inspectors and seed analysts.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(2) Procuring samples.
(3) Printing bulletins giving the results of inspection.
(4) Any other expenses of the Purdue University agricultural
programs authorized by law and for implementing this chapter.
(c) The dean of agriculture of Purdue University, with assistance
from the state seed commissioner, shall make and submit an annual
financial report to the:
(1) governor;
(2) legislative council; and
(3) budget committee;
in such form as the state board of accounts requires, showing the total
receipts and expenditures of all fees received under this chapter, by
December 31 of each year. The report must also include general
information regarding how many licenses are issued under this
chapter and how many acres of land are used in hemp production
under this chapter. The budget committee shall review this report
annually.
(d) Excess funds from the collection of fees under this chapter are
subject to IC 15-16-2-36.
SECTION 40. IC 15-15-13-18 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 18. (a) A person who sells hemp in Indiana must:
(1) be licensed in Indiana and in the jurisdiction where the hemp
was grown; and
(2) provide the buyer with a receipt that contains the seller's
name, place of business, and license number and quantity of hemp
sold.
(b) A person who buys hemp in Indiana must retain the receipt
described in subsection (a)(2) for a period of two (2) years.
SECTION 41. IC 15-15-13-19 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 19. (a) Hemp bud (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-23) and
hemp flower (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-24) may be sold only to a
processor licensed under this chapter.
(b) The state seed commissioner may impose a civil penalty under
section 13 of this chapter for a violation of subsection (a).
SECTION 42. IC 15-15-13-19.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19.1. An industrial hemp product
that is manufactured into a hemp derived cannabinoid product as
defined in IC 35-48-8-4, is subject to IC 7.1-8 and not this chapter.
SECTION 43. IC 15-15-13-21 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 21. A county, city, town, or township may not adopt or
enforce an ordinance restricting or regulating:
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(1) the growth, production, or processing of hemp; or
(2) any subject regulated by this chapter.
SECTION 44. IC 16-31-3-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 109, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) A person holding a
certificate or license issued under this article must comply with the
applicable standards and rules established under this article. A
certificate holder or license holder is subject to disciplinary sanctions
under subsection (b) if the department of homeland security determines
that the certificate holder or license holder:
(1) engaged in or knowingly cooperated in fraud or material
deception in order to obtain a certificate or license, including
cheating on a certification or licensure examination;
(2) engaged in fraud or material deception in the course of
professional services or activities;
(3) advertised services or goods in a false or misleading manner;
(4) falsified or knowingly allowed another person to falsify
attendance records or certificates of completion of continuing
education courses required under this article or rules adopted
under this article;
(5) is convicted of a crime, if the act that resulted in the
conviction has a direct bearing on determining if the certificate
holder or license holder should be entrusted to provide emergency
medical services;
(6) is convicted of violating IC 9-19-14.5;
(7) fails to comply and maintain compliance with or violates any
applicable provision, standard, or other requirement of this article
or rules adopted under this article;
(8) continues to practice if the certificate holder or license holder
becomes unfit to practice due to:
(A) professional incompetence that includes the undertaking
of professional activities that the certificate holder or license
holder is not qualified by training or experience to undertake;
(B) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or
practice;
(C) physical or mental disability; or
(D) addiction to, abuse of, or dependency on alcohol or other
drugs that endanger the public by impairing the certificate
holder's or license holder's ability to practice safely;
(9) engages in a course of lewd or immoral conduct in connection
with the delivery of services to the public;
(10) allows the certificate holder's or license holder's name or a
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


certificate or license issued under this article to be used in
connection with a person who renders services beyond the scope
of that person's training, experience, or competence;
(11) is subjected to disciplinary action in another state or
jurisdiction on grounds similar to those contained in this chapter.
For purposes of this subdivision, a certified copy of a record of
disciplinary action constitutes prima facie evidence of a
disciplinary action in another jurisdiction;
(12) assists another person in committing an act that would
constitute a ground for disciplinary sanction under this chapter;
(13) allows a certificate or license issued by the commission to
be:
(A) used by another person; or
(B) displayed to the public when the certificate or license is
expired, inactive, invalid, revoked, or suspended; or
(14) fails to notify the department in writing of any misdemeanor
or felony criminal conviction, except traffic related misdemeanors
other than operating a motor vehicle under the influence of a drug
or alcohol, within ninety (90) days after the entry of an order or
judgment. A certified copy of the order or judgment with a letter
of explanation must be submitted to the department along with the
written notice.
(b) The department of homeland security may issue an order under
IC 4-21.5-3-6 to impose one (1) or more of the following sanctions if
the department of homeland security determines that a certificate
holder or license holder is subject to disciplinary sanctions under
subsection (a):
(1) Revocation of a certificate holder's certificate or license
holder's license for a period not to exceed seven (7) years.
(2) Suspension of a certificate holder's certificate or license
holder's license for a period not to exceed seven (7) years.
(3) Censure of a certificate holder or license holder.
(4) Issuance of a letter of reprimand.
(5) Assessment of a civil penalty against the certificate holder or
license holder in accordance with the following:
(A) The civil penalty may not exceed five hundred dollars
($500) per day per violation.
(B) If the certificate holder or license holder fails to pay the
civil penalty within the time specified by the department of
homeland security, the department of homeland security may
suspend the certificate holder's certificate or license holder's
license without additional proceedings.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(6) Placement of a certificate holder or license holder on
probation status and requirement of the certificate holder or
license holder to:
(A) report regularly to the department of homeland security
upon the matters that are the basis of probation;
(B) limit practice to those areas prescribed by the department
of homeland security;
(C) continue or renew professional education approved by the
department of homeland security until a satisfactory degree of
skill has been attained in those areas that are the basis of the
probation; or
(D) perform or refrain from performing any acts, including
community restitution or service without compensation, that
the department of homeland security considers appropriate to
the public interest or to the rehabilitation or treatment of the
certificate holder or license holder.
The department of homeland security may withdraw or modify
this probation if the department of homeland security finds after
a hearing that the deficiency that required disciplinary action is
remedied or that changed circumstances warrant a modification
of the order.
(c) If an applicant or a certificate holder or license holder has
engaged in or knowingly cooperated in fraud or material deception to
obtain a certificate or license, including cheating on the certification or
licensure examination, the department of homeland security may
rescind the certificate or license if it has been granted, void the
examination or other fraudulent or deceptive material, and prohibit the
applicant from reapplying for the certificate or license for a length of
time established by the department of homeland security.
(d) The department of homeland security may deny certification or
licensure to an applicant who would be subject to disciplinary sanctions
under subsection (b) if that person were a certificate holder or license
holder, has had disciplinary action taken against the applicant or the
applicant's certificate or license to practice in another state or
jurisdiction, or has practiced without a certificate or license in violation
of the law. A certified copy of the record of disciplinary action is
conclusive evidence of the other jurisdiction's disciplinary action.
(e) The department of homeland security may order a certificate
holder or license holder to submit to a reasonable physical or mental
examination if the certificate holder's or license holder's physical or
mental capacity to practice safely and competently is at issue in a
disciplinary proceeding. Failure to comply with a department of
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


homeland security order to submit to a physical or mental examination
makes a certificate holder or license holder liable to temporary
suspension under subsection (i).
(f) Except as provided under subsection (a), subsection (g), and
section 14.5 of this chapter, a certificate or license may not be denied,
revoked, or suspended because the applicant, certificate holder, or
license holder has been convicted of an offense. The acts from which
the applicant's, certificate holder's, or license holder's conviction
resulted may be considered as to whether the applicant or certificate
holder or license holder should be entrusted to serve the public in a
specific capacity.
(g) The department of homeland security may deny, suspend, or
revoke a certificate or license issued under this article if the individual
who holds or is applying for the certificate or license is convicted of
any of the following:
(1) Possession of cocaine or a narcotic drug under IC 35-48-4-6.
(2) Possession of methamphetamine under IC 35-48-4-6.1.
(3) Possession of a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4-7(a).
IC 35-48-4-7(b).
(4) Fraudulently obtaining a controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-7(c). IC 35-48-4-7(d).
(5) Manufacture of paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.1(c).
(6) Dealing in paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.5(b).
(7) Possession of paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.3(b) (before
its amendment on July 1, 2015).
(8) Possession of marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia as a Class
D felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or Level 6
felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014) under
IC 35-48-4-11.
(9) A felony offense under IC 35-48-4 involving:
(A) possession of a synthetic drug (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-321);
(B) possession of a synthetic drug lookalike substance (as
defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321.5 (before its repeal on July 1,
2019)) as a:
(i) Class D felony (for a crime committed before July 1,
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


2014); or
(ii) Level 6 felony (for a crime committed after June 30,
2014);
under IC 35-48-4-11.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019); or
(C) possession of a controlled substance analog (as defined in
IC 35-48-1.1-8).
(10) Maintaining a common nuisance under IC 35-48-4-13
(repealed) or IC 35-45-1-5, if the common nuisance involves a
controlled substance.
(11) An offense relating to registration, labeling, and prescription
forms under IC 35-48-4-14.
(h) A decision of the department of homeland security under
subsections (b) through (g) may be appealed to the commission under
IC 4-21.5-3-7.
(i) The department of homeland security may temporarily suspend
a certificate holder's certificate or license holder's license under
IC 4-21.5-4 before a final adjudication or during the appeals process if
the department of homeland security finds that a certificate holder or
license holder would represent a clear and immediate danger to the
public's health, safety, or property if the certificate holder or license
holder were allowed to continue to practice.
(j) On receipt of a complaint or information alleging that a person
certified or licensed under this chapter or IC 16-31-3.5 has engaged in
or is engaging in a practice that is subject to disciplinary sanctions
under this chapter, the department of homeland security must initiate
an investigation against the person.
(k) The department of homeland security shall conduct a factfinding
investigation as the department of homeland security considers proper
in relation to the complaint.
(l) The department of homeland security may reinstate a certificate
or license that has been suspended under this section if the department
of homeland security is satisfied that the applicant is able to practice
with reasonable skill, competency, and safety to the public. As a
condition of reinstatement, the department of homeland security may
impose disciplinary or corrective measures authorized under this
chapter.
(m) The department of homeland security may not reinstate a
certificate or license that has been revoked under this chapter.
(n) The department of homeland security must be consistent in the
application of sanctions authorized in this chapter. Significant
departures from prior decisions involving similar conduct must be
explained in the department of homeland security's findings or orders.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(o) A certificate holder may not surrender the certificate holder's
certificate, and a license holder may not surrender the license holder's
license, without the written approval of the department of homeland
security, and the department of homeland security may impose any
conditions appropriate to the surrender or reinstatement of a
surrendered certificate or license.
(p) For purposes of this section, "certificate holder" means a person
who holds:
(1) an unlimited certificate;
(2) a limited or probationary certificate; or
(3) an inactive certificate.
(q) For purposes of this section, "license holder" means a person
who holds:
(1) an unlimited license;
(2) a limited or probationary license; or
(3) an inactive license.
SECTION 45. IC 22-15-5-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 123, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) A practitioner shall comply
with the standards established under this licensing program. A
practitioner is subject to the exercise of the disciplinary sanctions under
IC 22-12-7-7 if the department finds that a practitioner has:
(1) engaged in or knowingly cooperated in fraud or material
deception in order to obtain a license to practice, including
cheating on a licensing examination;
(2) engaged in fraud or material deception in the course of
professional services or activities;
(3) advertised services or goods in a false or misleading manner;
(4) falsified or knowingly allowed another person to falsify
attendance records or certificates of completion of continuing
education courses provided under this chapter;
(5) been convicted of a crime that has a direct bearing on the
practitioner's ability to continue to practice competently;
(6) knowingly violated a state statute or rule or federal statute or
regulation regulating the profession for which the practitioner is
licensed;
(7) continued to practice although the practitioner has become
unfit to practice due to:
(A) professional incompetence;
(B) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or
practice;
(C) physical or mental disability; or
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(D) addiction to, abuse of, or severe dependency on alcohol or
other drugs that endanger the public by impairing a
practitioner's ability to practice safely;
(8) engaged in a course of lewd or immoral conduct in connection
with the delivery of services to the public;
(9) allowed the practitioner's name or a license issued under this
chapter to be used in connection with an individual or business
who renders services beyond the scope of that individual's or
business's training, experience, or competence;
(10) had disciplinary action taken against the practitioner or the
practitioner's license to practice in another state or jurisdiction on
grounds similar to those under this chapter;
(11) assisted another person in committing an act that would
constitute a ground for disciplinary sanction under this chapter;
or
(12) allowed a license issued by the department to be:
(A) used by another person; or
(B) displayed to the public when the license has expired, is
inactive, is invalid, or has been revoked or suspended.
For purposes of subdivision (10), a certified copy of a record of
disciplinary action constitutes prima facie evidence of a disciplinary
action in another jurisdiction.
(b) If an applicant or a practitioner has engaged in or knowingly
cooperated in fraud or material deception to obtain a license to
practice, including cheating on the licensing examination, the
department may rescind the license if it has been granted, void the
examination or other fraudulent or deceptive material, and prohibit the
applicant from reapplying for the license for a length of time
established by the department.
(c) The department may deny licensure to an applicant who has had
disciplinary action taken against the applicant or the applicant's license
to practice in another state or jurisdiction or who has practiced without
a license in violation of the law. A certified copy of the record of
disciplinary action is conclusive evidence of the other jurisdiction's
disciplinary action.
(d) The department may order a practitioner to submit to a
reasonable physical or mental examination if the practitioner's physical
or mental capacity to practice safely and competently is at issue in a
disciplinary proceeding. Failure to comply with a department order to
submit to a physical or mental examination makes a practitioner liable
to temporary suspension under subsection (h).
(e) Except as provided under subsection (f) or (g), a license may not
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


be denied, revoked, or suspended because the applicant or holder has
been convicted of an offense. The acts from which the applicant's or
holder's conviction resulted may, however, be considered as to whether
the applicant or holder should be entrusted to serve the public in a
specific capacity.
(f) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued
under this chapter if the individual who holds the license is convicted
of any of the following:
(1) Possession of cocaine or a narcotic drug under IC 35-48-4-6.
(2) Possession of methamphetamine under IC 35-48-4-6.1.
(3) Possession of a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4-7(a).
IC 35-48-4-7(b).
(4) Fraudulently obtaining a controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-7(b) IC 35-48-4-7(c) (for a crime committed before
July 1, 2014) or IC 35-48-4-7(c) IC 35-48-4-7(d) (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014).
(5) Manufacture of paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.1(c).
(6) Dealing in paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.5(b).
(7) Possession of paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.3(b) (before
its amendment on July 1, 2015).
(8) Possession of marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia as a Class
D felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
6 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014) under
IC 35-48-4-11.
(9) A felony offense under IC 35-48-4 involving possession of a
synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), possession of a
controlled substance analog (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or
possession of a synthetic drug lookalike substance (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-321.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019)) as a:
(A) Class D felony for a crime committed before July 1, 2014;
or
(B) Level 6 felony for a crime committed after June 30, 2014;
under IC 35-48-4-11.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019).
(10) Maintaining a common nuisance under IC 35-48-4-13
(repealed) or IC 35-45-1-5, if the common nuisance involves a
controlled substance.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(11) An offense relating to registration, labeling, and prescription
forms under IC 35-48-4-14.
(g) The department shall deny, revoke, or suspend a license issued
under this chapter if the individual who holds the license is convicted
of any of the following:
(1) Dealing in a controlled substance resulting in death under
IC 35-42-1-1.5.
(2) Dealing in cocaine or a narcotic drug under IC 35-48-4-1.
(3) Dealing in methamphetamine under IC 35-48-4-1.1.
(4) Manufacturing methamphetamine under IC 35-48-4-1.2.
(5) Dealing in a schedule I, II, or III controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-2.
(6) Dealing in a schedule IV controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-3.
(7) Dealing in a schedule V controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-4.
(8) Dealing in a substance represented to be a controlled
substance under IC 35-48-4-4.5 (repealed).
(9) Knowingly or intentionally manufacturing, advertising,
distributing, or possessing with intent to manufacture, advertise,
or distribute a substance represented to be a controlled substance
under IC 35-48-4-4.6.
(10) Dealing in a counterfeit substance under IC 35-48-4-5.
(11) Dealing in marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia as a felony
under IC 35-48-4-10.
(12) An offense under IC 35-48-4 involving the manufacture or
sale of a synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), a
synthetic drug lookalike substance (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-321.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019)) under
IC 35-48-4-10.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019), a controlled
substance analog (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or a substance
represented to be a controlled substance (as described in
IC 35-48-4-4.6).
(13) A violation of any federal or state drug law or rule related to
wholesale legend drug distributors licensed under IC 25-26-14.
(h) The department may temporarily suspend a practitioner's license
under IC 4-21.5-4 before a final adjudication or during the appeals
process if the department finds that a practitioner represents a clear and
immediate danger to the public's health, safety, or property if the
practitioner is allowed to continue to practice.
(i) On receipt of a complaint or an information alleging that a person
licensed under this chapter has engaged in or is engaging in a practice
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


that jeopardizes the public health, safety, or welfare, the department
shall initiate an investigation against the person.
(j) Any complaint filed with the office of the attorney general
alleging a violation of this licensing program shall be referred to the
department for summary review and for its general information and any
authorized action at the time of the filing.
(k) The department shall conduct a fact finding investigation as the
department considers proper in relation to the complaint.
(l) A practitioner may petition the department to accept the
surrender of the practitioner's license. The practitioner may not
surrender the practitioner's license without the written approval of the
department, and the department may impose any conditions appropriate
to the surrender or reinstatement of a surrendered license.
(m) A practitioner who has been subjected to disciplinary sanctions
may be required by the commission to pay the costs of the proceeding.
The practitioner's ability to pay shall be considered when costs are
assessed. If the practitioner fails to pay the costs, a suspension may not
be imposed solely upon the practitioner's inability to pay the amount
assessed. The costs are limited to costs for the following:
(1) Court reporters.
(2) Transcripts.
(3) Certification of documents.
(4) Photo duplication.
(5) Witness attendance and mileage fees.
(6) Postage.
(7) Expert witnesses.
(8) Depositions.
(9) Notarizations.
SECTION 46. IC 24-4-21 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Distribution of Low THC Hemp Extract).
SECTION 47. IC 24-4-22 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Low THC Hemp Extract Sales).
SECTION 48. IC 24-5-0.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2024,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A supplier may not commit an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction. Such an act, omission, or practice by a supplier
is a violation of this chapter whether it occurs before, during, or after
the transaction. An act, omission, or practice prohibited by this section
includes both implicit and explicit misrepresentations.
(b) Without limiting the scope of subsection (a), the following acts,
and the following representations as to the subject matter of a
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


consumer transaction, made orally, in writing, or by electronic
communication, by a supplier, are deceptive acts:
(1) That such subject of a consumer transaction has sponsorship,
approval, performance, characteristics, accessories, uses, or
benefits it does not have which the supplier knows or should
reasonably know it does not have.
(2) That such subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular
standard, quality, grade, style, or model, if it is not and if the
supplier knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(3) That such subject of a consumer transaction is new or unused,
if it is not and if the supplier knows or should reasonably know
that it is not.
(4) That such subject of a consumer transaction will be supplied
to the public in greater quantity than the supplier intends or
reasonably expects.
(5) That replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, if it is not and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(6) That a specific price advantage exists as to such subject of a
consumer transaction, if it does not and if the supplier knows or
should reasonably know that it does not.
(7) That the supplier has a sponsorship, approval, or affiliation in
such consumer transaction the supplier does not have, and which
the supplier knows or should reasonably know that the supplier
does not have.
(8) That such consumer transaction involves or does not involve
a warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, or other rights, remedies,
or obligations, if the representation is false and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that the representation is false.
(9) That the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other
benefit as an inducement for entering into a sale or lease in return
for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or
otherwise helping the supplier to enter into other consumer
transactions, if earning the benefit, rebate, or discount is
contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time
the consumer agrees to the purchase or lease.
(10) That the supplier is able to deliver or complete the subject of
the consumer transaction within a stated period of time, when the
supplier knows or should reasonably know the supplier could not.
If no time period has been stated by the supplier, there is a
presumption that the supplier has represented that the supplier
will deliver or complete the subject of the consumer transaction
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


within a reasonable time, according to the course of dealing or the
usage of the trade.
(11) That the consumer will be able to purchase the subject of the
consumer transaction as advertised by the supplier, if the supplier
does not intend to sell it.
(12) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction can be made by the supplier for the estimate
the supplier gives a customer for the replacement or repair, if the
specified work is completed and:
(A) the cost exceeds the estimate by an amount equal to or
greater than ten percent (10%) of the estimate;
(B) the supplier did not obtain written permission from the
customer to authorize the supplier to complete the work even
if the cost would exceed the amounts specified in clause (A);
(C) the total cost for services and parts for a single transaction
is more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and
(D) the supplier knew or reasonably should have known that
the cost would exceed the estimate in the amounts specified in
clause (A).
(13) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, and that the supplier disposes of
the part repaired or replaced earlier than seventy-two (72) hours
after both:
(A) the customer has been notified that the work has been
completed; and
(B) the part repaired or replaced has been made available for
examination upon the request of the customer.
(14) Engaging in the replacement or repair of the subject of a
consumer transaction if the consumer has not authorized the
replacement or repair, and if the supplier knows or should
reasonably know that it is not authorized.
(15) The act of misrepresenting the geographic location of the
supplier by listing an alternate business name or an assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a local telephone
directory if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) the listing fails to identify the locality and state of the
supplier's business;
(C) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the calling area covered by the local telephone
directory; and
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(D) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the calling area covered by the
local telephone directory.
(16) The act of listing an alternate business name or assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a directory
assistance data base if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the local calling area; and
(C) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the local calling area.
(17) The violation by a supplier of IC 24-3-4 concerning
cigarettes for import or export.
(18) The act of a supplier in knowingly selling or reselling a
product to a consumer if the product has been recalled, whether
by the order of a court or a regulatory body, or voluntarily by the
manufacturer, distributor, or retailer, unless the product has been
repaired or modified to correct the defect that was the subject of
the recall.
(19) The violation by a supplier of 47 U.S.C. 227, including any
rules or regulations issued under 47 U.S.C. 227.
(20) The violation by a supplier of the federal Fair Debt
Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.), including any
rules or regulations issued under the federal Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.).
(21) A violation of IC 7.1-8 (concerning the manufacture,
distribution, and sale of hemp derived cannabinoid products),
as set forth in IC 7.1-8-20-5.
(21) (22) A violation of IC 24-5-7 (concerning health spa
services), as set forth in IC 24-5-7-17.
(22) (23) A violation of IC 24-5-8 (concerning business
opportunity transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-8-20.
(23) (24) A violation of IC 24-5-10 (concerning home consumer
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-10-18.
(24) (25) A violation of IC 24-5-11 (concerning real property
improvement contracts), as set forth in IC 24-5-11-14.
(25) (26) A violation of IC 24-5-12 (concerning telephone
solicitations), as set forth in IC 24-5-12-23.
(26) (27) A violation of IC 24-5-13.5 (concerning buyback motor
vehicles), as set forth in IC 24-5-13.5-14.
(27) (28) A violation of IC 24-5-14 (concerning automatic
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


dialing-announcing devices), as set forth in IC 24-5-14-13.
(28) (29) A violation of IC 24-5-15 (concerning credit services
organizations), as set forth in IC 24-5-15-11.
(29) (30) A violation of IC 24-5-16 (concerning unlawful motor
vehicle subleasing), as set forth in IC 24-5-16-18.
(30) (31) A violation of IC 24-5-17 (concerning environmental
marketing claims), as set forth in IC 24-5-17-14.
(31) (32) A violation of IC 24-5-19 (concerning deceptive
commercial solicitation), as set forth in IC 24-5-19-11.
(32) (33) A violation of IC 24-5-21 (concerning prescription drug
discount cards), as set forth in IC 24-5-21-7.
(33) (34) A violation of IC 24-5-23.5-7 (concerning real estate
appraisals), as set forth in IC 24-5-23.5-9.
(34) (35) A violation of IC 24-5-26 (concerning identity theft), as
set forth in IC 24-5-26-3.
(35) (36) A violation of IC 24-5.5 (concerning mortgage rescue
fraud), as set forth in IC 24-5.5-6-1.
(36) (37) A violation of IC 24-8 (concerning promotional gifts
and contests), as set forth in IC 24-8-6-3.
(37) (38) A violation of IC 21-18.5-6 (concerning representations
made by a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution), as set forth in IC 21-18.5-6-22.5.
(38) (39) A violation of IC 24-5-15.5 (concerning collection
actions of a plaintiff debt buyer), as set forth in IC 24-5-15.5-6.
(39) (40) A violation of IC 24-14 (concerning towing services), as
set forth in IC 24-14-10-1.
(40) (41) A violation of IC 24-5-14.5 (concerning misleading or
inaccurate caller identification information), as set forth in
IC 24-5-14.5-12.
(41) (42) A violation of IC 24-5-27 (concerning intrastate inmate
calling services), as set forth in IC 24-5-27-27.
(42) (43) A violation of IC 15-21 (concerning sales of dogs by
retail pet stores), as set forth in IC 15-21-7-4.
(43) (44) A violation of IC 24-4-23 (concerning the security of
information collected and transmitted by an adult oriented website
operator), as set forth in IC 24-4-23-14.
(c) Any representations on or within a product or its packaging or
in advertising or promotional materials which would constitute a
deceptive act shall be the deceptive act both of the supplier who places
such representation thereon or therein, or who authored such materials,
and such other suppliers who shall state orally or in writing that such
representation is true if such other supplier shall know or have reason
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


to know that such representation was false.
(d) If a supplier shows by a preponderance of the evidence that an
act resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of
procedures reasonably adopted to avoid the error, such act shall not be
deceptive within the meaning of this chapter.
(e) It shall be a defense to any action brought under this chapter that
the representation constituting an alleged deceptive act was one made
in good faith by the supplier without knowledge of its falsity and in
reliance upon the oral or written representations of the manufacturer,
the person from whom the supplier acquired the product, any testing
organization, or any other person provided that the source thereof is
disclosed to the consumer.
(f) For purposes of subsection (b)(12), a supplier that provides
estimates before performing repair or replacement work for a customer
shall give the customer a written estimate itemizing as closely as
possible the price for labor and parts necessary for the specific job
before commencing the work.
(g) For purposes of subsection (b)(15) and (b)(16), a telephone
company or other provider of a telephone directory or directory
assistance service or its officer or agent is immune from liability for
publishing the listing of an alternate business name or assumed
business name of a supplier in its directory or directory assistance data
base unless the telephone company or other provider of a telephone
directory or directory assistance service is the same person as the
supplier who has committed the deceptive act.
(h) For purposes of subsection (b)(18), it is an affirmative defense
to any action brought under this chapter that the product has been
altered by a person other than the defendant to render the product
completely incapable of serving its original purpose.
SECTION 49. IC 24-5-0.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 133, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A person relying upon an
uncured or incurable deceptive act may bring an action for the damages
actually suffered as a consumer as a result of the deceptive act or five
hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater. The court may increase
damages for a willful deceptive act in an amount that does not exceed
the greater of:
(1) three (3) times the actual damages of the consumer suffering
the loss; or
(2) one thousand dollars ($1,000).
Except as provided in subsection (k), the court may award reasonable
attorney's fees to the party that prevails in an action under this
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


subsection. This subsection does not apply to a consumer transaction
in real property, including a claim or action involving a construction
defect (as defined in IC 32-27-3-1(5)) brought against a construction
professional (as defined in IC 32-27-3-1(4)), except for purchases of
time shares and camping club memberships. This subsection does not
apply with respect to a deceptive act described in section 3(b)(20) of
this chapter. This subsection also does not apply to a violation of
IC 24-4.7, IC 24-5-12, IC 24-5-14, or IC 24-5-14.5. Actual damages
awarded to a person under this section have priority over any civil
penalty imposed under this chapter.
(b) Any person who is entitled to bring an action under subsection
(a) on the person's own behalf against a supplier for damages for a
deceptive act may bring a class action against such supplier on behalf
of any class of persons of which that person is a member and which has
been damaged by such deceptive act, subject to and under the Indiana
Rules of Trial Procedure governing class actions, except as herein
expressly provided. Except as provided in subsection (k), the court may
award reasonable attorney's fees to the party that prevails in a class
action under this subsection, provided that such fee shall be determined
by the amount of time reasonably expended by the attorney and not by
the amount of the judgment, although the contingency of the fee may
be considered. Except in the case of an extension of time granted by the
attorney general under IC 24-10-2-2(b) in an action subject to IC 24-10,
any money or other property recovered in a class action under this
subsection which cannot, with due diligence, be restored to consumers
within one (1) year after the judgment becomes final shall be returned
to the party depositing the same. This subsection does not apply to a
consumer transaction in real property, except for purchases of time
shares and camping club memberships. This subsection does not apply
with respect to a deceptive act described in section 3(b)(20) of this
chapter. Actual damages awarded to a class have priority over any civil
penalty imposed under this chapter.
(c) The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction, including a deceptive act described in section
3(b)(20) of this chapter, notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b).
However, the attorney general may seek to enjoin patterns of incurable
deceptive acts with respect to consumer transactions in real property.
In addition, the court may:
(1) issue an injunction;
(2) order the supplier to make payment of the money unlawfully
received from the aggrieved consumers to be held in escrow for
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


distribution to aggrieved consumers;
(3) for a knowing violation against a senior consumer, increase
the amount of restitution ordered under subdivision (2) in any
amount up to three (3) times the amount of damages incurred or
value of property or assets lost;
(4) order the supplier to pay to the state the reasonable costs of
the attorney general's investigation and prosecution, expert fees,
and court fees related to the action;
(5) provide for the appointment of a receiver; and
(6) order the department of state revenue to suspend the supplier's
registered retail merchant certificate, subject to the requirements
and prohibitions contained in IC 6-2.5-8-7(a)(5), if the court finds
that a violation of this chapter involved the sale or solicited sale
of a synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), a synthetic
drug lookalike substance (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321.5
(repealed)) (before July 1, 2019), a controlled substance analog
(as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or a substance represented to be a
controlled substance (as described in IC 35-48-4-4.6).
(d) In an action under subsection (a), (b), (c), or (n) the court may
void or limit the application of contracts or clauses resulting from
deceptive acts and order restitution to be paid to aggrieved consumers.
(e) In any action under subsection (a) or (b), upon the filing of the
complaint or on the appearance of any defendant, claimant, or any
other party, or at any later time, the trial court, the supreme court, or the
court of appeals may require the plaintiff, defendant, claimant, or any
other party or parties to give security, or additional security, in such
sum as the court shall direct to pay all costs, expenses, and
disbursements that shall be awarded against that party or which that
party may be directed to pay by any interlocutory order by the final
judgment or on appeal.
(f) Any person who violates the terms of an injunction issued under
subsection (c) or (n) shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of
not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per violation. For the
purposes of this section, the court issuing an injunction shall retain
jurisdiction, the cause shall be continued, and the attorney general
acting in the name of the state may petition for recovery of civil
penalties. Whenever the court determines that an injunction issued
under subsection (c) or (n) has been violated, the court shall award
reasonable costs to the state.
(g) If a court finds any person has knowingly violated section 3 or
10 of this chapter, other than section 3(b)(19), 3(b)(20), or 3(b)(40)
3(b)(41) of this chapter, the attorney general, in an action pursuant to
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


subsection (c), may recover from the person on behalf of the state a
civil penalty of a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) per
violation.
(h) If a court finds that a person has violated section 3(b)(19) of this
chapter, the attorney general, in an action under subsection (c), may
recover from the person on behalf of the state a civil penalty as follows:
(1) For a knowing or intentional violation, one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500).
(2) For a violation other than a knowing or intentional violation,
five hundred dollars ($500).
A civil penalty recovered under this subsection shall be deposited in
the consumer protection division telephone solicitation fund
established by IC 24-4.7-3-6 to be used for the administration and
enforcement of section 3(b)(19) of this chapter.
(i) A senior consumer relying upon an uncured or incurable
deceptive act, including an act related to hypnotism, may bring an
action to recover treble damages, if appropriate.
(j) An offer to cure is:
(1) not admissible as evidence in a proceeding initiated under this
section unless the offer to cure is delivered by a supplier to the
consumer or a representative of the consumer before the supplier
files the supplier's initial response to a complaint; and
(2) only admissible as evidence in a proceeding initiated under
this section to prove that a supplier is not liable for attorney's fees
under subsection (k).
If the offer to cure is timely delivered by the supplier, the supplier may
submit the offer to cure as evidence to prove in the proceeding in
accordance with the Indiana Rules of Trial Procedure that the supplier
made an offer to cure.
(k) A supplier may not be held liable for the attorney's fees and
court costs of the consumer that are incurred following the timely
delivery of an offer to cure as described in subsection (j) unless the
actual damages awarded, not including attorney's fees and costs, exceed
the value of the offer to cure.
(l) If a court finds that a person has knowingly violated section
3(b)(20) of this chapter, the attorney general, in an action under
subsection (c), may recover from the person on behalf of the state a
civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
consumer. In determining the amount of the civil penalty in any action
by the attorney general under this subsection, the court shall consider,
among other relevant factors, the frequency and persistence of
noncompliance by the debt collector, the nature of the noncompliance,
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


and the extent to which the noncompliance was intentional. A person
may not be held liable in any action by the attorney general for a
violation of section 3(b)(20) of this chapter if the person shows by a
preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and
resulted from a bona fide error, notwithstanding the maintenance of
procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error. A person may not be
held liable in any action for a violation of this chapter for contacting a
person other than the debtor, if the contact is made in compliance with
the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act.
(m) If a court finds that a person has knowingly or intentionally
violated section 3(b)(40) 3(b)(41) of this chapter, the attorney general,
in an action under subsection (c), may recover from the person on
behalf of the state a civil penalty in accordance with
IC 24-5-14.5-12(b). As specified in IC 24-5-14.5-12(b), a civil penalty
recovered under IC 24-5-14.5-12(b) shall be deposited in the consumer
protection division telephone solicitation fund established by
IC 24-4.7-3-6 to be used for the administration and enforcement of
IC 24-5-14.5. In addition to the recovery of a civil penalty in
accordance with IC 24-5-14.5-12(b), the attorney general may also
recover reasonable attorney fees and court costs from the person on
behalf of the state. Those funds shall also be deposited in the consumer
protection division telephone solicitation fund established by
IC 24-4.7-3-6.
(n) An action that arises from, or otherwise involves, an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction described in section 2(a)(1)(D)(i) of this chapter
may be brought and enforced only by the attorney general under this
subsection. An action that arises from, or otherwise involves, an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction described in section 2(a)(1)(D)(ii) of this chapter
may be brought and enforced only by an attorney acting on behalf of
the local law enforcement agency involved in the transaction, unless
the local unit of government served by the local law enforcement
agency requests the attorney general to bring and enforce an action
under this subsection on behalf of the local unit. In addition, the court
may:
(1) issue an injunction;
(2) order the supplier to make payment of the money unlawfully
received from the aggrieved consumers to be held in escrow for
distribution to aggrieved consumers; or
(3) order the supplier to pay to:
(A) the attorney acting on behalf of the local law enforcement
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


agency; or
(B) the attorney general for the state;
as applicable, the reasonable costs of the attorney's or the attorney
general's investigation and prosecution, expert fees, and court fees
related to the action.
The time for bringing an action under subsection (c), as set forth in
section 5(b) of this chapter, applies to an action brought under this
subsection.
SECTION 50. IC 25-1-1.1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 134, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. Notwithstanding IC 25-1-7, a
board, a commission, or a committee may suspend, deny, or revoke a
license or certificate issued under this title by the board, the
commission, or the committee without an investigation by the office of
the attorney general if the individual who holds the license or
certificate is convicted of any of the following and the board,
commission, or committee determines, after the individual has
appeared in person, that the offense affects the individual's ability to
perform the duties of the profession:
(1) Possession of cocaine or a narcotic drug under IC 35-48-4-6.
(2) Possession of methamphetamine under IC 35-48-4-6.1.
(3) Possession of a controlled substance under IC 35-48-4-7(a).
IC 35-48-4-7(b).
(4) Fraudulently obtaining a controlled substance under
IC 35-48-4-7(c). IC 35-48-4-7(d).
(5) Manufacture of paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.1(c).
(6) Dealing in paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.5(b).
(7) Possession of paraphernalia as a Class D felony (for a crime
committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level 6 felony (for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014) under IC 35-48-4-8.3(b) (before
its amendment on July 1, 2015).
(8) Possession of marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia as a Class
D felony (for a crime committed before July 1, 2014) or a Level
6 felony (for a crime committed after June 30, 2014) under
IC 35-48-4-11.
(9) A felony offense under IC 35-48-4 involving possession of a
synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), possession of a
controlled substance analog (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


possession of a synthetic drug lookalike substance (as defined in
IC 35-31.5-2-321.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019)) as a:
(A) Class D felony for a crime committed before July 1, 2014;
or
(B) Level 6 felony for a crime committed after June 30, 2014;
under IC 35-48-4-11.5 (before its repeal on July 1, 2019).
(10) Maintaining a common nuisance under IC 35-48-4-13
(repealed) or IC 35-45-1-5, if the common nuisance involves a
controlled substance.
(11) An offense relating to registration, labeling, and prescription
forms under IC 35-48-4-14.
(12) A sex crime under IC 35-42-4.
(13) A felony that reflects adversely on the individual's fitness to
hold a professional license.
SECTION 51. IC 34-30-2.1-72, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 72. IC 7.1-5-10-15 (Concerning alcoholic
beverage a permittee or permittee's agent refusing to serve provide
alcoholic beverages or products containing THC to certain persons).
SECTION 52. IC 34-30-2.1-73, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 73. IC 7.1-5-10-15.5 (Concerning persons who
furnish an alcoholic beverage or a product containing THC for
damages caused by an impaired or intoxicated person).
SECTION 53. IC 35-31.5-2-61.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 61.5. "Container", for purposes
of IC 35-48-8, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-8-2.
SECTION 54. IC 35-31.5-2-152.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 152.2. "Hemp", for purposes of
this title, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-8-3.
SECTION 55. IC 35-31.5-2-152.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 152.3. "Hemp derived
cannabinoid product", for purposes of this title, has the meaning
set forth in IC 35-48-8-4.
SECTION 56. IC 35-31.5-2-169.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 169.3. "Industrial hemp", for
purposes of this title, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-8-5.
SECTION 57. IC 35-31.5-2-176.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 176.1. "Intermediate hemp
derived cannabinoid product", for purposes of IC 35-48-8, has the
meaning set forth in IC 35-48-8-6.
SECTION 58. IC 35-31.5-2-189.9 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]. Sec. 189.9. "Low THC hemp extract", for purposes of
IC 35-48, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-1.1-27.
SECTION 59. IC 35-46-1-11.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.7. (a) A retail establishment in which tobacco
products and products containing tetrahydrocannabinol (THC)
account for at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the retail
establishment's gross sales may not allow an individual who is less than
twenty-one (21) years of age to enter the retail establishment.
(b) An individual who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age may
not enter a retail establishment described in subsection (a).
(c) A retail establishment described in subsection (a) must
conspicuously post on all entrances to the retail establishment the
following:
(1) A sign in boldface type that states "NOTICE: It is unlawful for
a person less than 21 years old to enter this store.".
(2) A sign printed in letters and numbers at least one-half (1/2)
inch high that displays a toll free phone number for assistance to
callers in quitting smoking, as determined by the Indiana
department of health.
(d) A person who violates this section commits a Class C infraction.
Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4(c), a civil judgment for an infraction
committed under this section must be imposed as follows:
(1) If the person has not been cited for a violation of this section
in the previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to four hundred
dollars ($400).
(2) If the person has had one (1) violation in the previous one (1)
year, a civil penalty of up to eight hundred dollars ($800).
(3) If the person has had two (2) violations in the previous one (1)
year, a civil penalty of up to one thousand four hundred dollars
($1,400).
(4) If the person has had three (3) or more violations in the
previous one (1) year, a civil penalty of up to two thousand dollars
($2,000).
A person may not be cited more than once every twenty-four (24)
hours.
(e) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-5(c), civil penalties collected under
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


this section must be deposited in the Richard D. Doyle tobacco
education and enforcement fund established under IC 7.1-6-2-6.
(f) A person who violates subsection (a) at least six (6) times in any
one (1) year period commits habitual illegal entrance by a minor, a
Class B infraction.
SECTION 60. IC 35-48-1.1-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. "Controlled substance" means a
drug, substance, or immediate precursor in schedule I, II, III, IV, or V
under:
(1) IC 35-48-2-4, IC 35-48-2-6, IC 35-48-2-8, IC 35-48-2-10, or
IC 35-48-2-12, if IC 35-48-2-14 does not apply; or
(2) a rule adopted by the board, if IC 35-48-2-14 applies.
The term does not include low THC hemp extract.
SECTION 61. IC 35-48-1.1-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) "Controlled substance analog"
means a substance that, due to its chemical structure and potential for
abuse or misuse, meets the following criteria:
(1) The substance is substantially similar to a controlled substance
classified under IC 35-48-2.
(2) The substance has a narcotic, stimulant, depressant, or
hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system or is
represented or intended to have a narcotic, stimulant, depressant,
or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system
substantially similar to or greater than that of a controlled
substance classified under IC 35-48-2.
(b) The definition set forth in subsection (a) does not include:
(1) a controlled substance;
(2) a legend drug;
(3) a substance for which there is an approved new drug
application;
(4) any compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any
controlled substance, that is not for administration to a human
being or an animal, and that is packaged in a form or
concentration, or with adulterants or denaturants, such that as
packaged it does not present any significant potential for abuse;
or
(5) a substance to which an investigational exemption applies
under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act
(chapter 675, 52 Stat. 1052 (21 U.S.C. 355)), but only to the
extent that conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


exemption. or
(6) low THC hemp extract.
(c) For purposes of subsection (a), "substantially similar", as it
applies to the chemical structure of a substance, means that the
chemical structure of the substance, when compared to the structure of
a controlled substance, has a single difference in the structural formula
that substitutes one (1) atom or functional group for another, including:
(1) one (1) halogen for another halogen;
(2) one (1) hydrogen for a halogen;
(3) one (1) halogen for a hydrogen; or
(4) an alkyl group added or deleted:
(A) as a side chain to or from a molecule; or
(B) from a side chain of a molecule.
SECTION 62. IC 35-48-1.1-27 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 27. (a) "Low THC hemp extract" means a substance or
compound that:
(1) is derived from or contains any part of the plant Cannabis
sativa L. that meets the definition of hemp under IC 15-15-13-6;
(2) contains not more than three-tenths percent (0.3%) total
delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including precursors, by
weight; and
(3) contains no other controlled substances.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) the harvested reproductive organ, whether immature or
mature, of the female hemp plant; or
(2) smokable hemp.
SECTION 63. IC 35-48-1.1-29, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 29. (a) "Marijuana" means any part
of the plant genus Cannabis whether growing or not; the seeds thereof;
the resin extracted from any part of the plant, including hashish and
hash oil; any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or
preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) the mature stalks of the plant;
(2) fiber produced from the stalks;
(3) oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant;
(4) any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture,
or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted
therefrom);
(5) the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of
germination;
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(6) hemp (as defined by IC 15-15-13-6);
(7) low THC hemp extract; or
(8) smokable hemp.
(1) a hemp derived cannabinoid product (as defined in
IC 35-48-8-4); or
(2) industrial hemp monitored and licensed with the state seed
commissioner under IC 15-15-13.
SECTION 64. IC 35-48-1.1-38, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 249, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 38. (a) Except as provided in
subsection (b), "smokable hemp" means a product containing not more
than three-tenths percent (0.3%) delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol any
amount of tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), including precursors and
derivatives of THC, in a form that allows THC to be introduced into the
human body by inhalation of smoke. The term includes:
(1) hemp bud; and
(2) hemp flower.
(b) The term does not include:
(1) a hemp plant that is; or
(2) parts of a hemp plant that are;
grown or handled by a licensee governed by IC 15-15-13 and for
processing or manufacturing into a legal hemp derived cannabinoid
product under IC 7.1-8.
SECTION 65. IC 35-48-2-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.84-2010,
SECTION 92, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The board shall administer this article and
may recommend to the general assembly the addition, deletion, or
rescheduling of all substances listed in the schedules in sections 4, 6,
8, 10, and 12 of this chapter by submitting in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6 a report of such recommendations to the legislative
council. In making a determination regarding a substance, the board
shall consider the following:
(1) The actual or relative potential for abuse.
(2) The scientific evidence of its pharmacological effect, if
known.
(3) The state of current scientific knowledge regarding the
substance.
(4) The history and current pattern of abuse.
(5) The scope, duration, and significance of abuse.
(6) The risk to public health.
(7) The potential of the substance to produce psychic or
physiological dependence liability.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(8) Whether the substance is an immediate precursor of a
substance already controlled under this article.
(b) After considering the factors enumerated in subsection (a), the
board shall make findings and recommendations concerning the control
of the substance if it finds the substance has a potential for abuse.
(c) If the board finds that a substance is an immediate precursor,
substances which are precursors of the controlled precursor shall not
be subject to control solely because they are precursors of the
controlled precursor.
(d) If any substance is designated or rescheduled to a more
restrictive schedule as a controlled substance under federal law and
notice is given to the board, the board shall recommend similar control
of the substance under this article in the board's report to the general
assembly, unless the board objects to inclusion or rescheduling. In that
case, the board shall publish the reasons for objection and afford all
interested parties an opportunity to be heard. At the conclusion of the
hearing, the board shall publish its findings.
(e) This subsection does not include marijuana. If a substance is
rescheduled to a less restrictive schedule or deleted as a controlled
substance under federal law, the substance is rescheduled or deleted
under this article. If the board objects to inclusion, rescheduling, or
deletion of the substance, the board shall notify the chairman of the
legislative council not more than thirty (30) days after the federal law
is changed and the substance may not be rescheduled or deleted until
the conclusion of the next complete session of the general assembly.
The notice from the board to the chairman of the legislative council
must be published.
(f) The board shall conduct hearings regarding revocations,
suspensions, and restrictions of registrations as provided in
IC 35-48-3-4. All hearings shall be conducted in accordance with
IC 4-21.5-3.
(g) Authority to control under this section does not extend to
distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages, as those terms are defined or
used in IC 7.1, or to tobacco.
(h) The board shall exclude any nonnarcotic substance from a
schedule if that substance may, under the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act or state law, be sold over the counter without a
prescription.
SECTION 66. IC 35-48-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.61-2020,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) This section does not apply to a hemp
derived cannabinoid product as defined in IC 35-48-8-4.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(a) (b) A person who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally:
(A) manufactures;
(B) finances the manufacture of;
(C) delivers; or
(D) finances the delivery of;
a controlled substance or controlled substance analog, pure or
adulterated, classified in schedule I, except marijuana, hash oil,
hashish, or salvia, or a controlled substance, or controlled
substance analog, pure or adulterated, classified in schedule II or
III; or
(2) possesses, with intent to:
(A) manufacture;
(B) finance the manufacture of;
(C) deliver; or
(D) finance the delivery of;
a controlled substance or controlled substance analog, pure or
adulterated, classified in schedule I, except marijuana, hash oil,
hashish, or salvia, or a controlled substance, or controlled
substance analog, pure or adulterated, classified in schedule II or
III;
commits dealing in a schedule I, II, or III controlled substance, a Level
6 felony, except as provided in subsections (b) (c) through (f). (g).
(b) (c) A person may be convicted of an offense under subsection
(a)(2) (b)(2) only if:
(1) there is evidence in addition to the weight of the drug that the
person intended to manufacture, finance the manufacture of,
deliver, or finance the delivery of the drug; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least twenty-eight (28)
grams.
(c) (d) The offense is a Level 5 felony if:
(1) the amount of the drug involved is at least one (1) gram but
less than five (5) grams; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is less than one (1) gram and
an enhancing circumstance applies.
(d) (e) The offense is a Level 4 felony if:
(1) the amount of the drug involved is at least five (5) grams but
less than ten (10) grams; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least one (1) gram but
less than five (5) grams and an enhancing circumstance applies.
(e) (f) The offense is a Level 3 felony if:
(1) the amount of the drug involved is at least ten (10) grams but
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


less than twenty-eight (28) grams; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least five (5) grams but
less than ten (10) grams and an enhancing circumstance applies.
(f) (g) The offense is a Level 2 felony if:
(1) the amount of the drug involved is at least twenty-eight (28)
grams; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least ten (10) grams but
less than twenty-eight (28) grams and an enhancing circumstance
applies.
SECTION 67. IC 35-48-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.61-2020,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) This section does not apply to a hemp
derived cannabinoid product as defined in IC 35-48-8-4.
(a) (b) A person who, without a valid prescription or order of a
practitioner acting in the course of the practitioner's professional
practice, knowingly or intentionally possesses a:
(1) controlled substance or controlled substance analog (pure or
adulterated), classified in schedule I, except marijuana, hashish,
or salvia; or
(2) controlled substance or controlled substance analog (pure or
adulterated), classified in schedule II, III, or IV;
commits possession of a controlled substance, a Class A misdemeanor,
except as provided in subsection (b). (c).
(b) (c) The offense is a Level 6 felony if the person commits the
offense and an enhancing circumstance applies.
(c) (d) A person who, without a valid prescription or order of a
practitioner acting in the course of the practitioner's professional
practice, knowingly or intentionally obtains:
(1) more than four (4) ounces of schedule V controlled substances
containing codeine in any given forty-eight (48) hour period
unless pursuant to a prescription;
(2) a schedule V controlled substance pursuant to written or
verbal misrepresentation; or
(3) possession of a schedule V controlled substance other than by
means of a prescription or by means of signing an exempt
narcotic register maintained by a pharmacy licensed by the
Indiana state board of pharmacy;
commits a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 68. IC 35-48-4-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.153-2018,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A person who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally:
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(A) manufactures;
(B) finances the manufacture of;
(C) delivers; or
(D) finances the delivery of;
marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia, pure or adulterated; or
(2) possesses, with intent to:
(A) manufacture;
(B) finance the manufacture of;
(C) deliver; or
(D) finance the delivery of;
marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia, pure or adulterated;
commits dealing in marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia, a Class A
misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections (b) through (d).
(b) A person may be convicted of an offense under subsection (a)(2)
only if:
(1) there is evidence in addition to the weight of the drug that the
person intended to manufacture, finance the manufacture of,
deliver, or finance the delivery of the drug; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is at least:
(A) ten (10) pounds, if the drug is marijuana; or
(B) three hundred (300) grams, if the drug is hash oil, hashish,
or salvia.
(c) The offense is a Level 6 felony if:
(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug offense and the
amount of the drug involved is:
(A) less than thirty (30) grams of marijuana; or
(B) less than five (5) grams of hash oil, hashish, or salvia; or
(2) the amount of the drug involved is:
(A) at least thirty (30) grams but less than ten (10) pounds of
marijuana; or
(B) at least five (5) grams but less than three hundred (300)
grams of hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
(d) The offense is a Level 5 felony if:
(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug dealing offense
and the amount of the drug involved is:
(A) at least thirty (30) grams but less than ten (10) pounds of
marijuana; or
(B) at least five (5) grams but less than three hundred (300)
grams of hash oil, hashish, or salvia;
(2) the:
(A) amount of the drug involved is:
(i) at least ten (10) pounds of marijuana; or
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(ii) at least three hundred (300) grams of hash oil, hashish,
or salvia; or
(B) offense involved a sale to a minor; or
(3) the:
(A) person is a retailer;
(B) marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia is packaged in a
manner that appears to be low THC hemp extract; a hemp
derived cannabinoid product; and
(C) person knew or reasonably should have known that the
product was marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
SECTION 69. IC 35-48-4-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.153-2018,
SECTION 26, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) A person who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally possesses (pure or adulterated)
marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia;
(2) knowingly or intentionally grows or cultivates marijuana; or
(3) knowing that marijuana is growing on the person's premises,
fails to destroy the marijuana plants;
commits possession of marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia, a Class
B misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections (b) through (c).
(b) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Class A
misdemeanor if:
(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug offense; or
(2) the:
(A) marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia is packaged in a
manner that appears to be low THC hemp extract; a hemp
derived cannabinoid product; and
(B) person knew or reasonably should have known that the
product was marijuana, hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
(c) The offense described in subsection (a) is a Level 6 felony if:
(1) the person has a prior conviction for a drug offense; and
(2) the person possesses:
(A) at least thirty (30) grams of marijuana; or
(B) at least five (5) grams of hash oil, hashish, or salvia.
SECTION 70. IC 35-48-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 8. Offenses Relating to Hemp
Sec. 0.5. Nothing in IC 7.1 or IC 15 may be construed under the
"inclusio unius, exclusio alterius" canon of construction that
marijuana has been legalized.
Sec. 1. The terms defined in sections 2 through 6 of this chapter
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


apply only to this chapter and if cited in another statute concerning
hemp.
Sec. 2. (a) "Container" means the innermost wrapping,
packaging, or vessel in direct contact with a final hemp derived
cannabinoid product in which the final hemp derived cannabinoid
product is enclosed for retail sale to consumers, including a jar,
bottle, bag, box, packet, can, carton, or cartridge.
(b) The term excludes bulk shipping containers or outer
wrappings that are not essential for the final retail delivery or sale
to an end consumer for personal or household use.
(c) The term does not include a drug that is subject of an
application approved under 21 U.S.C. 355(c) or (j).
Sec. 3. (a) "Hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any
part of the plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers,
whether growing or not, with a total tetrahydrocannabinols
concentration (including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid) of not more
than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis.
(b) The term includes industrial hemp and hemp derived
cannabinoid products.
(c) The term does not include:
(1) any viable seeds from a Cannabis sativa L. plant that
exceeds a total tetrahydrocannabinols concentration
(including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid) of three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) in the plant on a dry weight basis;
(2) any intermediate hemp derived cannabinoid products
containing:
(A) cannabinoids that are not capable of being naturally
produced by a Cannabis sativa L. plant;
(B) cannabinoids that:
(i) are capable of being naturally produced by the
Cannabis sativa L. plant; and
(ii) were synthesized or manufactured outside the plant;
or
(C) more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%)
combined total concentration of:
(i) total tetrahydrocannabinols (including
tetrahydrocannabinolic acid); and
(ii) any other cannabinoids that have similar effects (or
are marketed to have similar effects) on humans or
animals as a tetrahydrocannabinol as determined by the
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services;
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(3) any intermediate hemp derived cannabinoid products
which are marketed or sold as a final product or directly to an
end consumer for personal or household use;
(4) any final hemp derived cannabinoid products containing:
(A) cannabinoids that are not capable of being naturally
produced by a Cannabis sativa L. plant;
(B) cannabinoids that:
(i) are capable of being naturally produced by a
Cannabis sativa L. plant; and
(ii) were synthesized or manufactured outside the plant;
or
(C) greater than four-tenths (0.4) milligram combined total
per container of:
(i) total tetrahydrocannabinols (including
tetrahydrocannabinolic acid); and
(ii) any other cannabinoids that have similar effects, or
are marketed to have similar effects, on humans or
animals as a tetrahydrocannabinol, as determined by the
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services;
or
(5) smokable hemp.
Sec. 4. "Hemp derived cannabinoid product" means a product
derived from, or made by, processing hemp plants or hemp plant
parts including derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids,
salts, and salts of isomers.
(b) The term includes any intermediate or final product derived
from hemp, other than industrial hemp, that:
(1) contains cannabinoids in any form; and
(2) is intended for human or animal use through any means of
application or administration including:
(A) inhalation;
(B) ingestion; or
(C) topical application.
(c) The term includes cannabidiol, a CBD product, or a product
that contains a cannabidiol.
(d) The term does not include:
(1) smokable hemp (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-38);
(2) products that contain a total tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration of more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%)
on a dry weight basis; or
(3) a drug that is the subject of an application approved under
subsection (c) or (j) of Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug,
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 355).
Sec. 5. "Industrial hemp" means hemp:
(1) grown for the use of the stalk of the plant fiber produced
from the stalk, or any other noncannabinoid derivative,
mixture, preparation, or manufacture of the stalk;
(2) grown for the use of the whole grain, oil, cake, nut, hull, or
other noncannabinoid compound, derivative, mixture,
preparation, or manufacture of the seeds of the plant;
(3) grown for purposes of producing microgreens or other
edible hemp leaf products for human consumption that are
derived from an immature hemp plant that is grown from
seeds that do not exceed the threshold for total
tetrahydrocannabinols concentration of three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) in the plant on a dry weight basis;
(4) that is a plant that does not enter the stream of commerce
and is intended to support hemp research at an institution of
higher education, as defined in 20 U.S.C. 1001, or an
independent research institute; or
(5) grown for the use of a viable seed of the plant produced
solely for the production or manufacture of any material
described in subdivisions (1) through (4).
Sec. 6. "Intermediate hemp derived cannabinoid product"
means a hemp derived cannabinoid product that:
(1) is not yet in the final form or preparation and is marketed
or intended to be used or consumed by a human or animal; or
(2) is a powder, liquid, tablet, oil, or other product form that
is intended or marketed to be mixed, dissolved, formulated, or
added to or prepared with or into any other substance prior
to administration or consumption.
Sec. 7. A person who:
(1) is a retailer under IC 7.1-8;
(2) knowingly or intentionally sells marijuana that is
packaged in a manner that appears to be a hemp derived
cannabinoid product; and
(3) knew or reasonably should have known that the product
was marijuana;
commits a Level 5 felony.
Sec. 8. (a) A person who does not hold a valid permit under
IC 7.1-8 who:
(1) knowingly or intentionally:
(A) manufactures;
(B) finances the manufacture of;
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(C) delivers;
(D) finances the delivery of; or
(E) sells;
hemp derived cannabinoid product; or
(2) possesses, with intent to:
(A) manufacture;
(B) finance the manufacture of;
(C) deliver;
(D) finance the delivery of; or
(E) sell;
hemp derived cannabinoid product;
commits unlicensed dealing in hemp derived cannabinoid product,
a Class A misdemeanor, except as provided in subsections (b)
through (d).
(b) A person may be convicted of an offense under subsection
(a)(2) only if:
(1) there is evidence in addition to the weight of the drug that
the person intended to manufacture, finance the manufacture
of, deliver, finance the delivery of, or sell, the hemp derived
cannabinoid product; or
(2) the amount of the hemp derived cannabinoid product
involved is at least ten (10) pounds.
(c) The offense is a Level 6 felony if the person has a prior
conviction for an offense under this section and the amount of the
hemp derived cannabinoid product involved is less than ten (10)
pounds.
(d) The offense is a Level 5 felony if the person has a prior
conviction for a dealing offense under this section and either:
(1) the amount of the hemp derived cannabinoid product
involved is less than ten (10) pounds; or
(2) the offense involved a sale to a minor.
SECTION 71. IC 35-52-7-39, AS ADDED BY P.L.169-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 39. IC 7.1-5-7-7 defines a crime concerning
alcohol and products containing THC.
SECTION 72. IC 35-52-7-40, AS ADDED BY P.L.169-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 40. IC 7.1-5-7-8 defines a crime concerning
alcohol and products containing THC.
SECTION 73. IC 35-52-7-98 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 98. IC 7.1-8-15-5 defines a crime
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


concerning hemp derived cannabinoid product certificate of
analyses.
SECTION 74. IC 35-52-7-99 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 99. IC 7.1-8-20-1 defines crimes
concerning the transportation of hemp derived cannabinoid
products.
SECTION 75. IC 35-52-7-100 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 100. IC 7.1-8-20-2 defines crimes
regarding hemp derived cannabinoid products permits.
SECTION 76. IC 35-52-7-101 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 101. IC 7.1-8-20-3 defines a crime
concerning the sale of hemp derived cannabinoid products over the
Internet.
SECTION 77. IC 35-52-7-102 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 102. IC 7.1-8-20-4 defines a crime
concerning recalled hemp derived cannabinoid products.
SECTION 78. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) The state seed
commissioner shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2, to comply with
this act by July 1, 2027.
(b) While rules are pending under subsection (a), the state seed
commissioner shall adopt provisional rules to comply with this act
by October 1, 2027.
(c) This SECTION expires January 1, 2028.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Commerce and
Technology, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 250, has had the
same under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 1, line 4, delete "tetrahydrocannabinol." and insert
"tetrahydrocannabinol, including hemp derived cannabinoid
products, synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the
plant or in the resinous extractives of Cannabis, and synthetic
substances, derivates, and their isomers with a similar chemical
structure and pharmacological activity.".
Page 3, between lines 1 and 2, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 4. IC 7.1-5-7-15 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. A person
twenty-one (21) years of age or older who knowingly or intentionally
encourages, aids, or induces a minor to unlawfully possess an alcoholic
beverage or a product containing THC commits a Class C infraction.
SECTION 5. IC 7.1-5-7-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.216-2011,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. The commission shall conduct random
unannounced inspections at locations where alcoholic beverages or
products containing THC are sold or distributed to ensure compliance
with this title. Only the commission may conduct the random
unannounced inspections. The commission may use retired or off duty
law enforcement officers to conduct inspections under this section.".
Page 4, between lines 39 and 40, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 4. The definitions in IC 35-48-8 apply throughout this
chapter.
Sec. 5. A product that purports to be a hemp derived
cannabinoid product, but is in violation of this article, is to be
treated as marijuana (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29).".
Page 5, line 15, delete "cannabinol" and insert "cannabidiol".
Page 5, line 16, delete "." and insert ", any other cannabinoids, or
any other controlled substances.
Sec. 3.5. "Container" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-48-8-2.".
Page 5, line 17, delete "or "hemp" and insert "has the meaning set
forth in IC 35-48-8-4.".
Page 5, delete lines 18 through 38.
Page 6, delete lines 3 through 4.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


Page 6, line 5, delete "8." and insert "7.".
Page 6, between lines 7 and 8, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 8. "Law enforcement officer" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-31.5-2-185.".
Page 6, line 20, after "hemp" insert "derived cannabinoid
products".
Page 6, line 23, after "manufactured" insert ", distributed, and
retailed".
Page 6, line 28, delete "IC 7.1-8-6-2(a)." and insert "IC
7.1-8-6-1(a).".
Page 7, line 35, after "search" insert "and seizure".
Page 8, between lines 37 and 38, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(c) The commission may assess a fee of one hundred dollars
($100) on behalf of the state police department to conduct criminal
background checks.".
Page 8, line 38, delete "(c)" and insert "(d)".
Page 8, line 41, delete "(d)" and insert "(e)".
Page 9, line 9, delete "permit" and insert "sales certificate".
Page 9, line 26, delete "article" and insert "title".
Page 9, line 37, delete "The permanent location of the business for
which the" and insert "The name and address of the business for
which the permit is issued.".
Page 9, delete line 38.
Page 10, delete lines 6 through 7.
Page 10, line 8, delete "2." and insert "1.".
Page 10, between lines 22 and 23, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(c) The commission may choose to not issue a permit to the new
owner if the new owner does not comply with the application
requirements of this article.".
Page 10, line 23, delete "3." and insert "2.".
Page 10, line 32, delete "4." and insert "3.".
Page 10, line 37, delete "5." and insert "4.".
Page 12, delete lines 34 through 42.
Page 13, delete lines 1 through 6.
Page 13, line 22, after "permit" insert "for ninety (90) days".
Page 14, line 6, after "1." insert "(a)".
Page 14, between lines 8 and 9, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(b) A hemp manufacturer shall only purchase hemp from a
person licensed to grow hemp under IC 15-15-13.".
Page 14, line 20, after "annually." insert "The commission shall
deposit this fee in the hemp derived cannabinoid products fund
established by IC 7.1-8-16.".
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


Page 14, between lines 22 and 23, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(d) A hemp manufacturer may only manufacture hemp derived
cannabinoid products in Indiana.".
Page 15, delete lines 1 through 8.
Page 15, line 11, after "purchase hemp" insert "derived
cannabinoid products".
Page 15, line 28, after "annually." insert "The commission shall
deposit this fee in the hemp derived cannabinoid products fund
established by IC 7.1-8-16.".
Page 15, line 34, delete "for consumption off the licensed premises".
Page 16, line 2, delete "." and insert ", as defined in IC 7.1-8-2-3.".
Page 16, line 23, after "1." insert "(a)".
Page 16, line 23, delete "derived cannabinoid".
Page 16, line 24, delete "products".
Page 16, line 25, after "transport" insert "hemp or".
Page 16, between lines 25 and 26, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(A) between a hemp grower, licensed under IC 15-15-13-7
and a hemp manufacturer;".
Page 16, line 26, delete "(A)" and insert "(B)".
Page 16, line 27, delete "(B)" and insert "(C)".
Page 16, line 28, delete "(C)" and insert "(D)".
Page 16, line 29, delete "derived".
Page 16, line 30, delete "cannabinoid products".
Page 16, between lines 30 and 31, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(b) A person transporting industrial hemp, as defined in
IC 35-48-8-5, is exempt under this article but must obtain a hemp
handler permit under IC 15-15-13-7 to transport industrial hemp.".
Page 17, line 10, after "transporting" insert "hemp or".
Page 17, line 17, delete "derived cannabinoid products".
Page 17, line 34, delete "may" and insert "shall".
Page 17, line 38, delete "(d)" and insert "(d)(1)".
Page 17, line 40, after "2." insert "(a)".
Page 17, line 40, after "must" insert "be conspicuous and".
Page 18, line 22, delete "That" and insert "Except as provided in
subsection (b), that".
Page 18, between lines 31 and 32, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(b) Subsection (a)(9) does not apply to CBD products, as
defined in IC 7.1-8-2-3.".
Page 18, delete lines 32 through 34.
Page 20, between lines 16 and 17, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(c) A hemp derived cannabinoid product with a falsified or
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


altered certificate of analysis is to be considered marijuana (as
defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29).".
Page 20, line 24, delete "commission." and insert "state budget
agency.".
Page 20, line 29, after "article;" insert "and".
Page 20, delete line 30.
Page 20, line 31, delete "(3)" and insert "(2)".
Page 20, delete lines 37 through 42, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"Sec. 2. In each state fiscal year, the prior state fiscal year
collections accrued to the fund shall be used by the commission as
follows:
(1) Seventy percent (70%) by the commission for the
administration of the purposes of this article.
(2) Twenty percent (20%) pursuant to the hemp derived
products law enforcement program as described in section 3
of this chapter.
(3) Five percent (5%) to the division of mental health and
addiction to provide funding for the 988 suicide and crisis
hotline.
(4) Five percent (5%) to the state general fund.".
Page 21, delete lines 1 through 10.
Page 21, line 14, delete "commission" and insert "state budget
agency".
Page 21, line 24, delete "article as" and insert "article.".
Page 21, delete line 25.
Page 21, line 33, delete "article as" and insert "article.".
Page 21, delete line 34.
Page 22, line 7, delete "use" and insert "uses".
Page 22, line 12, delete "and" and insert "or".
Page 22, between lines 36 and 37, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 1. The commission may do spot testing of hemp derived
cannabinoid products to ensure compliance with this article.".
Page 22, line 37, delete "1." and insert "2.".
Page 23, line 2, delete "A product that purports to be a hemp derived
cannabinoid" and insert "The commission shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 concerning the recall of hemp derived cannabinoid
products due to:
(1) improper or false labeling; or
(2) health and safety concerns.".
Page 23, delete lines 3 through 4.
Page 23, line 14, delete "marijuana." and insert "marijuana (as
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29).".
Page 23, line 29, delete "derived".
Page 23, line 30, delete "cannabinoid products".
Page 23, line 31, delete "(d)" and insert "Sec. 2.".
Page 23, line 31, after "seize" insert "hemp or".
Page 23, line 32, after "of" insert "this article.".
Page 23, delete line 33.
Page 23, line 34, delete "2." and insert "3.".
Page 24, line 3, delete "3." and insert "4.".
Page 24, line 4, after "Internet" insert "or by delivery".
Page 24, line 6, delete "4." and insert "5.".
Page 24, line 7, after "recalled" insert "under IC 7.1-8-18".
Page 24, between lines 8 and 9, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 6. A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this
article commits a deceptive act that is actionable by the attorney
general under IC 24-5-0.5 and is subject to the penalties listed in
IC 24-5-0.5.".
Page 24, line 17, strike "or".
Page 24, line 21, after "IC 6-2.5-1-16);" insert "or
(7) any combination of substances listed in subdivisions (1)
through (6);".
Page 24, line 27, delete "marijuana, hemp, and" and insert
"marijuana (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29), hemp (as defined in
IC 35-48-8-3), and tetrahydrocannbinol (as defined in
IC 7.1-1-3-46.5).".
Page 24, delete line 28.
Page 24, line 33, delete "develop a portal to share" and insert "share
information regarding the hemp program established under this
chapter with the state police department.".
Page 24, delete lines 34 through 35.
Page 25, line 2, delete "industrial".
Page 25, line 10, delete "or industrial hemp".
Page 25, line 15, delete "or industrial".
Page 25, line 16, delete "hemp".
Page 25, line 29, after "hemp" insert ",".
Page 25, line 29, strike "products,".
Page 26, line 5, delete "or industrial hemp".
Page 26, line 20, delete "IC 7.1-8-2-4." and insert "IC 35-48-8-4.".
Page 26, line 23, after "6.6." insert "(a)".
Page 26, between lines 24 and 25, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(b) The term includes hemp as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-29.".
Page 27, line 7, delete "Indiana. Industrial hemp" and insert
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


"Indiana. Hemp".
Page 27, line 18, delete "and industrial".
Page 27, line 19, delete "hemp or" and insert "or".
Page 27, line 24, delete "and industrial hemp." and insert ".".
Page 27, line 32, after "grower's" insert "or hemp handler's".
Page 27, line 40, after "coordinates" insert ", including the
geospatial decimal format,".
Page 27, line 41, strike "property used".
Page 27, line 41, delete "including" and insert "following:
(A) Site by field.
(B) Storage site.
(C) Receiving site.
(D) Staging site.
(E) Sites similar to the sites listed in clauses (A) through
(D).".
Page 27, delete line 42.
Page 28, delete lines 1 through 6.
Page 28, line 12, after "convicted" insert ",".
Page 28, line 12, strike "of".
Page 28, line 13, delete "any of the".
Page 28, line 14, delete "following".
Page 28, line 14, delete "and the" and insert "of:".
Page 28, delete lines 15 through 16.
Page 28, line 22, delete "felony." and insert "felony;
for which the applicant's conviction has not been expunged
under IC 35-38-9.".
Page 29, line 6, delete "for:" and insert "for, but not limited to:".
Page 29, line 9, delete "or".
Page 29, line 10, delete "oil." and insert "oil; or
(E) hemp derived cannabinoid products.".
Page 29, line 21, after "growing" insert "industrial".
Page 30, delete lines 17 through 25, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(5) has been convicted within five (5) years of the application
date of:
(A) a federal crime having a sentence of at least one (1)
year;
(B) a felony or a drug related misdemeanor under Indiana
law; or
(C) a crime in a state other than Indiana having a penalty
equal to the penalty for a felony;
and the conviction has not been expunged under IC 35-38-9;
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


or".
Page 30, line 33, delete "a hemp" and insert "any hemp".
Page 31, delete lines 5 through 7, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(2) Outdoor acreage or indoor square footage dedicated to
the growing of hemp.".
Page 31, line 9, delete "other." and insert "another specified use.".
Page 35, line 27, delete "The driver must hold a" and insert "A".
Page 35, line 29, delete "showing" and insert "identifying the
person".
Page 35, line 30, after "delivered," insert "including the person's".
Page 35, line 30, delete "address," and insert "address and".
Page 35, line 31, delete "variety of hemp, and quantity of hemp."
and insert "and the variety and quantity of the industrial hemp.".
Page 36, delete lines 15 through 18, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(b) The state seed commissioner shall include:
(1) the license number of the grower that produced the hemp;
and
(2) the license number of the hemp handler;
in the licensing documents described in subsection (a).".
Page 39, line 27, delete "under IC 7.1-8" and insert "as defined in
IC 35-48-8-4,".
Page 49, between lines 20 and 21, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 46. IC 24-5-0.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2024,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A supplier may not commit an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction. Such an act, omission, or practice by a supplier
is a violation of this chapter whether it occurs before, during, or after
the transaction. An act, omission, or practice prohibited by this section
includes both implicit and explicit misrepresentations.
(b) Without limiting the scope of subsection (a), the following acts,
and the following representations as to the subject matter of a
consumer transaction, made orally, in writing, or by electronic
communication, by a supplier, are deceptive acts:
(1) That such subject of a consumer transaction has sponsorship,
approval, performance, characteristics, accessories, uses, or
benefits it does not have which the supplier knows or should
reasonably know it does not have.
(2) That such subject of a consumer transaction is of a particular
standard, quality, grade, style, or model, if it is not and if the
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


supplier knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(3) That such subject of a consumer transaction is new or unused,
if it is not and if the supplier knows or should reasonably know
that it is not.
(4) That such subject of a consumer transaction will be supplied
to the public in greater quantity than the supplier intends or
reasonably expects.
(5) That replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, if it is not and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that it is not.
(6) That a specific price advantage exists as to such subject of a
consumer transaction, if it does not and if the supplier knows or
should reasonably know that it does not.
(7) That the supplier has a sponsorship, approval, or affiliation in
such consumer transaction the supplier does not have, and which
the supplier knows or should reasonably know that the supplier
does not have.
(8) That such consumer transaction involves or does not involve
a warranty, a disclaimer of warranties, or other rights, remedies,
or obligations, if the representation is false and if the supplier
knows or should reasonably know that the representation is false.
(9) That the consumer will receive a rebate, discount, or other
benefit as an inducement for entering into a sale or lease in return
for giving the supplier the names of prospective consumers or
otherwise helping the supplier to enter into other consumer
transactions, if earning the benefit, rebate, or discount is
contingent upon the occurrence of an event subsequent to the time
the consumer agrees to the purchase or lease.
(10) That the supplier is able to deliver or complete the subject of
the consumer transaction within a stated period of time, when the
supplier knows or should reasonably know the supplier could not.
If no time period has been stated by the supplier, there is a
presumption that the supplier has represented that the supplier
will deliver or complete the subject of the consumer transaction
within a reasonable time, according to the course of dealing or the
usage of the trade.
(11) That the consumer will be able to purchase the subject of the
consumer transaction as advertised by the supplier, if the supplier
does not intend to sell it.
(12) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction can be made by the supplier for the estimate
the supplier gives a customer for the replacement or repair, if the
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


specified work is completed and:
(A) the cost exceeds the estimate by an amount equal to or
greater than ten percent (10%) of the estimate;
(B) the supplier did not obtain written permission from the
customer to authorize the supplier to complete the work even
if the cost would exceed the amounts specified in clause (A);
(C) the total cost for services and parts for a single transaction
is more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750); and
(D) the supplier knew or reasonably should have known that
the cost would exceed the estimate in the amounts specified in
clause (A).
(13) That the replacement or repair constituting the subject of a
consumer transaction is needed, and that the supplier disposes of
the part repaired or replaced earlier than seventy-two (72) hours
after both:
(A) the customer has been notified that the work has been
completed; and
(B) the part repaired or replaced has been made available for
examination upon the request of the customer.
(14) Engaging in the replacement or repair of the subject of a
consumer transaction if the consumer has not authorized the
replacement or repair, and if the supplier knows or should
reasonably know that it is not authorized.
(15) The act of misrepresenting the geographic location of the
supplier by listing an alternate business name or an assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a local telephone
directory if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) the listing fails to identify the locality and state of the
supplier's business;
(C) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the calling area covered by the local telephone
directory; and
(D) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the calling area covered by the
local telephone directory.
(16) The act of listing an alternate business name or assumed
business name (as described in IC 23-0.5-3-4) in a directory
assistance data base if:
(A) the name misrepresents the supplier's geographic location;
(B) calls to the local telephone number are routinely forwarded
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


or otherwise transferred to a supplier's business location that
is outside the local calling area; and
(C) the supplier's business location is located in a county that
is not contiguous to a county in the local calling area.
(17) The violation by a supplier of IC 24-3-4 concerning
cigarettes for import or export.
(18) The act of a supplier in knowingly selling or reselling a
product to a consumer if the product has been recalled, whether
by the order of a court or a regulatory body, or voluntarily by the
manufacturer, distributor, or retailer, unless the product has been
repaired or modified to correct the defect that was the subject of
the recall.
(19) The violation by a supplier of 47 U.S.C. 227, including any
rules or regulations issued under 47 U.S.C. 227.
(20) The violation by a supplier of the federal Fair Debt
Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.), including any
rules or regulations issued under the federal Fair Debt Collection
Practices Act (15 U.S.C. 1692 et seq.).
(21) A violation of IC 7.1-8 (concerning the manufacture,
distribution, and sale of hemp derived cannabinoid products),
as set forth in IC 7.1-8-20-5.
(21) (22) A violation of IC 24-5-7 (concerning health spa
services), as set forth in IC 24-5-7-17.
(22) (23) A violation of IC 24-5-8 (concerning business
opportunity transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-8-20.
(23) (24) A violation of IC 24-5-10 (concerning home consumer
transactions), as set forth in IC 24-5-10-18.
(24) (25) A violation of IC 24-5-11 (concerning real property
improvement contracts), as set forth in IC 24-5-11-14.
(25) (26) A violation of IC 24-5-12 (concerning telephone
solicitations), as set forth in IC 24-5-12-23.
(26) (27) A violation of IC 24-5-13.5 (concerning buyback motor
vehicles), as set forth in IC 24-5-13.5-14.
(27) (28) A violation of IC 24-5-14 (concerning automatic
dialing-announcing devices), as set forth in IC 24-5-14-13.
(28) (29) A violation of IC 24-5-15 (concerning credit services
organizations), as set forth in IC 24-5-15-11.
(29) (30) A violation of IC 24-5-16 (concerning unlawful motor
vehicle subleasing), as set forth in IC 24-5-16-18.
(30) (31) A violation of IC 24-5-17 (concerning environmental
marketing claims), as set forth in IC 24-5-17-14.
(31) (32) A violation of IC 24-5-19 (concerning deceptive
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


commercial solicitation), as set forth in IC 24-5-19-11.
(32) (33) A violation of IC 24-5-21 (concerning prescription drug
discount cards), as set forth in IC 24-5-21-7.
(33) (34) A violation of IC 24-5-23.5-7 (concerning real estate
appraisals), as set forth in IC 24-5-23.5-9.
(34) (35) A violation of IC 24-5-26 (concerning identity theft), as
set forth in IC 24-5-26-3.
(35) (36) A violation of IC 24-5.5 (concerning mortgage rescue
fraud), as set forth in IC 24-5.5-6-1.
(36) (37) A violation of IC 24-8 (concerning promotional gifts
and contests), as set forth in IC 24-8-6-3.
(37) (38) A violation of IC 21-18.5-6 (concerning representations
made by a postsecondary credit bearing proprietary educational
institution), as set forth in IC 21-18.5-6-22.5.
(38) (39) A violation of IC 24-5-15.5 (concerning collection
actions of a plaintiff debt buyer), as set forth in IC 24-5-15.5-6.
(39) (40) A violation of IC 24-14 (concerning towing services), as
set forth in IC 24-14-10-1.
(40) (41) A violation of IC 24-5-14.5 (concerning misleading or
inaccurate caller identification information), as set forth in
IC 24-5-14.5-12.
(41) (42) A violation of IC 24-5-27 (concerning intrastate inmate
calling services), as set forth in IC 24-5-27-27.
(42) (43) A violation of IC 15-21 (concerning sales of dogs by
retail pet stores), as set forth in IC 15-21-7-4.
(43) (44) A violation of IC 24-4-23 (concerning the security of
information collected and transmitted by an adult oriented website
operator), as set forth in IC 24-4-23-14.
(c) Any representations on or within a product or its packaging or
in advertising or promotional materials which would constitute a
deceptive act shall be the deceptive act both of the supplier who places
such representation thereon or therein, or who authored such materials,
and such other suppliers who shall state orally or in writing that such
representation is true if such other supplier shall know or have reason
to know that such representation was false.
(d) If a supplier shows by a preponderance of the evidence that an
act resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of
procedures reasonably adopted to avoid the error, such act shall not be
deceptive within the meaning of this chapter.
(e) It shall be a defense to any action brought under this chapter that
the representation constituting an alleged deceptive act was one made
in good faith by the supplier without knowledge of its falsity and in
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


reliance upon the oral or written representations of the manufacturer,
the person from whom the supplier acquired the product, any testing
organization, or any other person provided that the source thereof is
disclosed to the consumer.
(f) For purposes of subsection (b)(12), a supplier that provides
estimates before performing repair or replacement work for a customer
shall give the customer a written estimate itemizing as closely as
possible the price for labor and parts necessary for the specific job
before commencing the work.
(g) For purposes of subsection (b)(15) and (b)(16), a telephone
company or other provider of a telephone directory or directory
assistance service or its officer or agent is immune from liability for
publishing the listing of an alternate business name or assumed
business name of a supplier in its directory or directory assistance data
base unless the telephone company or other provider of a telephone
directory or directory assistance service is the same person as the
supplier who has committed the deceptive act.
(h) For purposes of subsection (b)(18), it is an affirmative defense
to any action brought under this chapter that the product has been
altered by a person other than the defendant to render the product
completely incapable of serving its original purpose.
SECTION 47. IC 24-5-0.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 133, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) A person relying upon an
uncured or incurable deceptive act may bring an action for the damages
actually suffered as a consumer as a result of the deceptive act or five
hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater. The court may increase
damages for a willful deceptive act in an amount that does not exceed
the greater of:
(1) three (3) times the actual damages of the consumer suffering
the loss; or
(2) one thousand dollars ($1,000).
Except as provided in subsection (k), the court may award reasonable
attorney's fees to the party that prevails in an action under this
subsection. This subsection does not apply to a consumer transaction
in real property, including a claim or action involving a construction
defect (as defined in IC 32-27-3-1(5)) brought against a construction
professional (as defined in IC 32-27-3-1(4)), except for purchases of
time shares and camping club memberships. This subsection does not
apply with respect to a deceptive act described in section 3(b)(20) of
this chapter. This subsection also does not apply to a violation of
IC 24-4.7, IC 24-5-12, IC 24-5-14, or IC 24-5-14.5. Actual damages
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


awarded to a person under this section have priority over any civil
penalty imposed under this chapter.
(b) Any person who is entitled to bring an action under subsection
(a) on the person's own behalf against a supplier for damages for a
deceptive act may bring a class action against such supplier on behalf
of any class of persons of which that person is a member and which has
been damaged by such deceptive act, subject to and under the Indiana
Rules of Trial Procedure governing class actions, except as herein
expressly provided. Except as provided in subsection (k), the court may
award reasonable attorney's fees to the party that prevails in a class
action under this subsection, provided that such fee shall be determined
by the amount of time reasonably expended by the attorney and not by
the amount of the judgment, although the contingency of the fee may
be considered. Except in the case of an extension of time granted by the
attorney general under IC 24-10-2-2(b) in an action subject to IC 24-10,
any money or other property recovered in a class action under this
subsection which cannot, with due diligence, be restored to consumers
within one (1) year after the judgment becomes final shall be returned
to the party depositing the same. This subsection does not apply to a
consumer transaction in real property, except for purchases of time
shares and camping club memberships. This subsection does not apply
with respect to a deceptive act described in section 3(b)(20) of this
chapter. Actual damages awarded to a class have priority over any civil
penalty imposed under this chapter.
(c) The attorney general may bring an action to enjoin an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction, including a deceptive act described in section
3(b)(20) of this chapter, notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b).
However, the attorney general may seek to enjoin patterns of incurable
deceptive acts with respect to consumer transactions in real property.
In addition, the court may:
(1) issue an injunction;
(2) order the supplier to make payment of the money unlawfully
received from the aggrieved consumers to be held in escrow for
distribution to aggrieved consumers;
(3) for a knowing violation against a senior consumer, increase
the amount of restitution ordered under subdivision (2) in any
amount up to three (3) times the amount of damages incurred or
value of property or assets lost;
(4) order the supplier to pay to the state the reasonable costs of
the attorney general's investigation and prosecution, expert fees,
and court fees related to the action;
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(5) provide for the appointment of a receiver; and
(6) order the department of state revenue to suspend the supplier's
registered retail merchant certificate, subject to the requirements
and prohibitions contained in IC 6-2.5-8-7(a)(5), if the court finds
that a violation of this chapter involved the sale or solicited sale
of a synthetic drug (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321), a synthetic
drug lookalike substance (as defined in IC 35-31.5-2-321.5
(repealed)) (before July 1, 2019), a controlled substance analog
(as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-8), or a substance represented to be a
controlled substance (as described in IC 35-48-4-4.6).
(d) In an action under subsection (a), (b), (c), or (n) the court may
void or limit the application of contracts or clauses resulting from
deceptive acts and order restitution to be paid to aggrieved consumers.
(e) In any action under subsection (a) or (b), upon the filing of the
complaint or on the appearance of any defendant, claimant, or any
other party, or at any later time, the trial court, the supreme court, or the
court of appeals may require the plaintiff, defendant, claimant, or any
other party or parties to give security, or additional security, in such
sum as the court shall direct to pay all costs, expenses, and
disbursements that shall be awarded against that party or which that
party may be directed to pay by any interlocutory order by the final
judgment or on appeal.
(f) Any person who violates the terms of an injunction issued under
subsection (c) or (n) shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of
not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per violation. For the
purposes of this section, the court issuing an injunction shall retain
jurisdiction, the cause shall be continued, and the attorney general
acting in the name of the state may petition for recovery of civil
penalties. Whenever the court determines that an injunction issued
under subsection (c) or (n) has been violated, the court shall award
reasonable costs to the state.
(g) If a court finds any person has knowingly violated section 3 or
of this chapter, other than section 3(b)(19), 3(b)(20), or 3(b)(40)
3(b)(41) of this chapter, the attorney general, in an action pursuant to
subsection (c), may recover from the person on behalf of the state a
civil penalty of a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) per
violation.
(h) If a court finds that a person has violated section 3(b)(19) of this
chapter, the attorney general, in an action under subsection (c), may
recover from the person on behalf of the state a civil penalty as follows:
(1) For a knowing or intentional violation, one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500).
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


(2) For a violation other than a knowing or intentional violation,
five hundred dollars ($500).
A civil penalty recovered under this subsection shall be deposited in
the consumer protection division telephone solicitation fund
established by IC 24-4.7-3-6 to be used for the administration and
enforcement of section 3(b)(19) of this chapter.
(i) A senior consumer relying upon an uncured or incurable
deceptive act, including an act related to hypnotism, may bring an
action to recover treble damages, if appropriate.
(j) An offer to cure is:
(1) not admissible as evidence in a proceeding initiated under this
section unless the offer to cure is delivered by a supplier to the
consumer or a representative of the consumer before the supplier
files the supplier's initial response to a complaint; and
(2) only admissible as evidence in a proceeding initiated under
this section to prove that a supplier is not liable for attorney's fees
under subsection (k).
If the offer to cure is timely delivered by the supplier, the supplier may
submit the offer to cure as evidence to prove in the proceeding in
accordance with the Indiana Rules of Trial Procedure that the supplier
made an offer to cure.
(k) A supplier may not be held liable for the attorney's fees and
court costs of the consumer that are incurred following the timely
delivery of an offer to cure as described in subsection (j) unless the
actual damages awarded, not including attorney's fees and costs, exceed
the value of the offer to cure.
(l) If a court finds that a person has knowingly violated section
3(b)(20) of this chapter, the attorney general, in an action under
subsection (c), may recover from the person on behalf of the state a
civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) per
consumer. In determining the amount of the civil penalty in any action
by the attorney general under this subsection, the court shall consider,
among other relevant factors, the frequency and persistence of
noncompliance by the debt collector, the nature of the noncompliance,
and the extent to which the noncompliance was intentional. A person
may not be held liable in any action by the attorney general for a
violation of section 3(b)(20) of this chapter if the person shows by a
preponderance of evidence that the violation was not intentional and
resulted from a bona fide error, notwithstanding the maintenance of
procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error. A person may not be
held liable in any action for a violation of this chapter for contacting a
person other than the debtor, if the contact is made in compliance with
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act.
(m) If a court finds that a person has knowingly or intentionally
violated section 3(b)(40) 3(b)(41) of this chapter, the attorney general,
in an action under subsection (c), may recover from the person on
behalf of the state a civil penalty in accordance with
IC 24-5-14.5-12(b). As specified in IC 24-5-14.5-12(b), a civil penalty
recovered under IC 24-5-14.5-12(b) shall be deposited in the consumer
protection division telephone solicitation fund established by
IC 24-4.7-3-6 to be used for the administration and enforcement of
IC 24-5-14.5. In addition to the recovery of a civil penalty in
accordance with IC 24-5-14.5-12(b), the attorney general may also
recover reasonable attorney fees and court costs from the person on
behalf of the state. Those funds shall also be deposited in the consumer
protection division telephone solicitation fund established by
IC 24-4.7-3-6.
(n) An action that arises from, or otherwise involves, an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction described in section 2(a)(1)(D)(i) of this chapter
may be brought and enforced only by the attorney general under this
subsection. An action that arises from, or otherwise involves, an unfair,
abusive, or deceptive act, omission, or practice in connection with a
consumer transaction described in section 2(a)(1)(D)(ii) of this chapter
may be brought and enforced only by an attorney acting on behalf of
the local law enforcement agency involved in the transaction, unless
the local unit of government served by the local law enforcement
agency requests the attorney general to bring and enforce an action
under this subsection on behalf of the local unit. In addition, the court
may:
(1) issue an injunction;
(2) order the supplier to make payment of the money unlawfully
received from the aggrieved consumers to be held in escrow for
distribution to aggrieved consumers; or
(3) order the supplier to pay to:
(A) the attorney acting on behalf of the local law enforcement
agency; or
(B) the attorney general for the state;
as applicable, the reasonable costs of the attorney's or the attorney
general's investigation and prosecution, expert fees, and court fees
related to the action.
The time for bringing an action under subsection (c), as set forth in
section 5(b) of this chapter, applies to an action brought under this
subsection.".
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


Page 51, line 2, delete "IC 35-48-8," and insert "this title,".
Page 51, line 6, delete "IC 35-48-8," and insert "this title,".
Page 51, line 11, delete "IC 35-48-8," and insert "this title,".
Page 53, delete lines 26 through 33.
Page 54, line 25, delete "IC 7.1-8-2-4);" and insert "IC 35-48-8-4);".
Page 56, line 20, delete "IC 7.1-8-2-4." and insert "IC 35-48-8-4.".
Page 57, line 33, delete "IC 7.1-8-2-4." and insert "IC 35-48-8-4.".
Page 60, line 18, delete "extenion" and insert "exclusio".
Page 60, line 36, delete "grown" and insert "growing".
Page 61, line 23, delete "or".
Page 61, line 39, delete "." and insert "; or
(5) smokable hemp.".
Page 61, line 40, delete "any" and insert "a product derived from,
or made by, processing hemp plants or hemp plant parts including
derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts
of isomers.
(b) The term includes any intermediate or final product derived
from hemp, other than industrial hemp, that:
(1) contains cannabinoids in any form; and
(2) is intended for human or animal use through any means of
application or administration including:
(A) inhalation;
(B) ingestion; or
(C) topical application.
(c) The term includes cannabidiol, a CBD product, or a product
that contains a cannabidiol.
(d) The term does not include:
(1) smokable hemp (as defined in IC 35-48-1.1-38);
(2) products that contain a total tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration of more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%)
on a dry weight basis; or
(3) a drug that is the subject of an application approved under
subsection (c) or (j) of Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug,
and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. 355).".
Page 61, delete lines 41 through 42.
Page 62, delete lines 1 through 6.
Page 63, line 2, delete ";" and insert ":".
Page 63, line 33, after "and" insert "either:
(1)".
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107


Page 63, line 35, delete "pounds or" and insert "pounds; or
(2)".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to SB 250 as introduced.)
BUCHANAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 2.
SB 250—LS 7117/DI 107